Shamen Ebeneezer good UK
And to that he finally responded: “If you go to hell, I will miss you. Namaste, Ram Dass.” I laughed — a lot — and I was simultaneously crestfallen. Because now I knew he was choosing not to endorse my book, it wasn’t simply that my requests had gotten overlooked in a pile of mail. So perhaps my “rot in hell” routine was what he was referring to when he said I used to talk “off the wall.” Though undoubtedly I had teetered on the wall many times before that.
"We have reached the moment of truth. We have a brief window of opportunity to avoid a major double-dip in employment," said Raymond Torres from the ILO.
My enemies once grouped like cattle
Elaine Greenwood-Hyde says it better than I can:
One Rule To Rule Them All And In The Darkness Bind Them: Remember that you are in the same room as a lot of other people, including actors, who can both see and hear you.
me what if they
Foreign Secretary William Hague launched the Foreign & Commonwealth Office’s (FCO) annual Human Rights and Democracy report on Monday for 2011.
And that's why
When the beef was ready to be served we vented our frustrations by standing in front of it and repeatedly giving it the 'V' sign until the waitress collected it.It was a lovely bit of beef and didn't deserve this, but it made us feel better.
Yesterday's jaunt to run some errands—and buy a zipper started out right—and then changed. My car started misbehaving—and since I was closer to the garage mechanic than home—I ended up there.
My first introduction to the story, or at least the first I can recall, was a Great Illustrated Classics edition I read as a boy. Without going back to look at it, I’m comfortable with even my haziest of memories that that version cut significant corners. Now, I don’t doubt my enjoyment of that read, but its presentation may well have marred my current experience. Like so many great books, divorcing the story of Moby Dick from Ishmael’s telling of that story sacrifices far too much to be allowed. Thus my suspicion I knew the wrong amount, or at least the wrong sorts, of things about Moby Dick before I read it.
I've been sick and apparently unable to read a calendar for a week...oops.
July 13th - our wedding anniversary. Also the birthday of our friend who was Ryan's best man.
A propaganda model focuses on this inequality of wealth and power and its multilevel effects on mass-media interests and choices.
Whitney had a lot of troubles and demons, but she also had a faith that is undeniable. In all of the interviews replayed and memories shared during the last week that is the one thing you hear over and over again, her love for God. She was open and honest about her troubles, but in her interview with Oprah she admitted that through it all “I still read my Bible and talk to God.”
We felt prompted to share the gospel with her none-the-less. While sharing the good news, I used the evangecube, a tool that presents the gospel in picture form. When I turned the cube to the picture of Jesus, she gasped. “I’ve seen a vision of Him before. I was only eleven. But when I saw that exact face, He came to me and said, ‘This bread is for you’. Everything is about to change for me,” she said. You should’ve seen our expressions. We were in awe.
And if you don’t know who Bill Brown is, you better ask somebody!
copyright Book Dragon's Lair 2009-2012
Also, I’ve been working on a new project. I was hired by the local paper, the Lakeland Ledger, to helm the hunting section of their new website, PolkOutdoors.com. Money for writing about hunting – it’s something I’ve always wanted to do, but the wheels turn slow!
Jami: My family. People listening to me helped. I know that there's some people I drove crazy by talking about my miscarriage and infertility. There's others that just listened to me -- and still listen to me -- for however long I want to talk about it.
You are shown how to share with others how you feel, what you have dealt with and what hurdles you have to leap over to try to be accepted. Reading about how others that may not fit into the societal ideal may really make you see things differently, and treat them with respect.
Here’s the thing: I agree with the sentiment that too many people are passing judgements on others when they don’t know the whole story AND that bullying or being mean is just WRONG! But, the truth is, their stories are theirs, and the acceptability of their life situations is none of my business! Or anyone else’s! Not my place to look at a person and judge them… ever! The 15-year-old may not have been raped. Maybe she just made a conscious decision to have a child at 15. Or, maybe she just made a mistake. (God knows I’ve made plenty of mistakes myself)! Whatever! She doesn’t need, want or deserve–and shouldn’t care about–my judgement. And whether the overweight guy ate too much or has a disease is none of my business either. I’ve got my own weight issues to contend with. He’s a person just like me and I’m not here to judge him just as I hope you are not here to judge me. Remember the whole living in glass houses and throwing stones thing? As for the old man, beauty should be in the eye of the beholder but apparently, it’s in the eye of the media. And I, for one, am sick and tired of tv, magazine, internet and billboard ads shoving their version of beauty down my throat. There are a lot of “beautiful”-on-the-outside/ugly-on-the-inside folks I’d rather NOT know and plenty of “ugly”-on-the-outside/beautiful-on-the-inside folks I’d be lucky to call my friends! Pffttthhh (that’s my sad attempt at spelling a raspberry)! Bravo and my undying gratitude to that man who fought for our country. Every scar he carries is a medal of honor. I’m one of those people who believes that scars add character and experience adds wisdom. It’s a story waiting to be told and I’m an eager listener. Send all of these folks over to my house and I’m sure we’ll all be chatting and laughing and enjoying each other’s company in short order.
So I chose to attend the Entreleadership workshop in Nashville 2 years ago. That rocked my world. I came away with 28 pages of typed notes, and a binder full of notes and thoughts. I condensed my notes into 6 pages of action items (another still learned from Entre).
It's the perfect book for big brothers and sisters everywhere.
I don’t have the patience for inane and illogical website navigation systems. I never liked Yahoo’s busy look and cumbersome navigation system, and only use Yahoo when I need to access an online writing group to download a file. I was trying to access that group today, but Yahoo told me I had to create a profile first. WTF: I already had a profile. I closed the box and tried again, but it repeated its
five socks of varying sizes and colors
Sooo silly. A caricature only slightly more ridiculous than the real thing. Fave quote,"sometimes I think I should move back to Wisconsin"
I am writing this as Jon Snow’s documentary, ‘Sri Lanka’s Killing Fields: War Crimes Unpunished’ is on tv. I like Jon Snow, he’s one of the few News Journalists I admire and find totally unpretentious. However, his documentary, on the ongoing conflict in my ancestral homeland does sicken me. It feels, having watched it that it is a totally biased story. By this I mean that the Govt of Sri Lanka is committing war crimes….Yes, war is brutal and unforgiving but the tragedy that was/is the Sri Lankan Civil War carries its basis in the Colonial past of the country and the 1970′s, wherein the LTTE rose to power.
I supervised teeth whitening and professional haircuts. I instructed them in wedding etiquette and proper actions while in semi-formal attire.
I noticed this fabulous blonde standing over to the side.
“I’m sure there’s going to be arguing going on because he’s going to keep it real, and part of that is disagreeing with each other and I know that there’s gonna be a lot of disagreements, but it’s good. Hopefully everybody just keeps it real. That’s Howard’s motto.”
Instead, CBS created a trilogy of television shows all centered around sex slavery.
First off, I knew all the twists before they happened. ALL OF THEM.
Now that many of you are finished with Insurgent, I am often asked when book 3 will be coming out. We still don't have an official month and day, but I do have more information-- book 3 is scheduled to release next fall, Fall 2013.
Lady Wingshot
I've been quite taken with the new perfume ad from Avon - Avon U by Ungaro. It features Avon Global Ambassador, Reese Witherspoon, looking stunning in a sheath of peach satin. She takes an old fashioned elevator (like the one in Fatal Attraction - where Glenn Close has her way with Micheal Douglas) up to the roof-top of a very tall building. It's dark and a little too breezy because her hair is getting all messed up (she should have gone to L'Oreal). Here she is joined by a tall dark attractive man in a dinner jacket, looking nonchalantly shaken but not too stirred. Perhaps he has lost a mint in the neighbouring Casino because his bow tie is hanging loosely around his collar; or perhaps he has a box of Milk Tray stuffed down his trousers, he is that type of guy. As the couple look longingly at each other a voice over cuts across the scene and says: 'What happens next is up to U to decide' . . . . Well obviously the Cactus Kid turns up with his underage pregnant girlfriend and he shares out bottles of 'Oasis' before they all fly off in a passing helicopter. Several years later they crash land into the penultimate episode of 'Lost' where they swap partners at least four times, have six children, one porcupine and an African Violet between them. On day 3,046 they are all evicted but still manage to live happily ever after, thanks to the exclusive magazine deals with 'Hello', 'OK', 'Gardener's World' and 'The People's Friend'. Then a nice Avon lady rings my doorbell, I let her in and she sells me a pink heart shaped 'Soap-on-a-Rope' . . .
Totes in addition budgets will be in countless behaviour, shapes and forms, the majority of daughters as well as for ladies well as over ladies have awide variety utilizing house owners.
The moral of this story is, the world of today has no morals.....
ROM 1:17 For therein is the righteousness of God revealed from faith to faith: as it is written, The just shall live by faith.
HOME FRONT SHAKY, BUT HOLDING
Service is a little slow, they’re busy but I still feel a bit forgotten, but the 55€ degustation seems like such good value I’m in good spirits.
I hate all things that incorporate the word 'Dixie' into them, and despite avoiding this one for years for that very reason, I decided to buy it just so I could hate on it.
Paul continues to describe the people who miss this revelation and how the desire for money is actually quite self-destructive:
So without further adieu.....
Niteroi, Brazil
Thursday: Pizza night (Premade Crusts (Rustic Crust or Trader Joe's pizza dough are good suggestions) for hubby and I and frozen homemade crust with Daiya Dairy-free/Soy-free cheese for my little guy)
“Oh sure, Wolf, Is that why they call you Chicken Butt?”
CSC Walk @Punggol Promenade – 9 September 2011 (4.30pm – 7pm)
The "brain" article ends with this passage by neuroscientist David Eagleman, which I strongly agree with:
Sec. 16. The State shall protect and advance the right of the people to a balanced and healthful ecology in accord with the rhythm and harmony of nature.
There is a priestly requirement that every person called by God must meet. The only way to know what the requirement is and to know if you are truly called by God is to “come up” into God’s presence and be there as referenced in:
Postage: Do you offer/insist on registered post or offer Express Post? Is the charge built into your item price? Do you have flat postage for all products or does it vary? Do you charge for packaging and handling as well as Australia Post charges? Do you post internationally? What if an item goes missing or is damaged during transport? Again, think about it now and make it clear for all to see.
Sure, being balanced with your content is a safe approach. But Handley pointed out that people would want to talk more about your content if there’s a clear side to an issue. It’ll get more people to share that content and get others interested. Make sure that you’re educated about whatever side you choose to support on an issue, and stick to it. The better written and more supported the argument is, the more credible you’ll be.
~ Engaging in ecstatic dance, merges the outer expression of manifested creativity, the manifestation is the Masculine, the creativity is the Feminine, the dance when in the female form can be the dance of the Lover to the spirit of God, when in the male body can be the dance of the Lover to the Goddess.
Bob home tomorrow for two weeks thank goodness. He has his head set on painting house, windows, doors WHY!! I am going to try and get him to take me away for a few days for my birthday......pigs might fly!
Simple sweet cardigan
He walked in the same formation each time, starting up the southern side of the carpark. In the far corner there was a silver vehicle all by itself, its owner walking over to meet it. The person got closer to the car, and then seemed to move very fast at the driver door entry. After about ten seconds or so, the person suddenly shifted over to the front passenger door on the opposite side of the car. He thought they must be having trouble with their keys. He wasn't that far away now, but he didn't want to ask if they needed help. He hoped they wouldn't ask him, so he could continue on his rounds.
With the outbreak of the Civil War, classes were suddenly interrupted when the entire student body and many faculty from Ole Miss enlisted in the Confederate army. Their company, Company A, 11th Mississippi Infantry, was nicknamed the University Grays, and suffered a high casualty rate during the Civil War. A great number of those casualties occurred during Pickett's Charge at the Battle of Gettysburg on July 3, 1863, when the University Grays made the deepest encroachment into Union territory. Some of the soldiers actually crossed the Union defensive fortification wall, only to be killed, wounded or captured. On the very next day, July 4, Confederate forces surrendered at Vicksburg, Mississippi; the two battles together are commonly viewed as the turning point in the war. When Ole Miss re-opened, only one member of the University Greys was able to visit the university to address the student body.
I was delighted when British Prime Minister David Cameron and French President Nicolas Sarkozy recently expressed their antagonism towards “multiculturalism”. I suppose the Zuma administration was too busy counting the number of Zimbabweans, Nigerians, Tanzanians, etc…, who are pouring into this country at an alarming rate, to even take notice of what these learned European leaders were saying!
SLEUTHFEST 2011
But then, people kind of noticed something funny. They noticed that Bert Blyleven's statistics -- those stubborn numbers -- were a lot better than Morris'. His ERA was more than a half-run lower. He had 1,200 more strikeouts. He had fewer walks, even though he pitched many more innings. He had more than twice as many shutouts. He even had 37 more wins.
Well, this is a homemade recipe, no link, no book… Just me and veggies! Now my trick is to cut the veggies up small. This is for two reasons. So your non vegetable eating companion either doesn’t notice them, or concludes they are way to small to be bothered picking out. So here we go.
Right. Chocolate truffle and coffee in front of me.
Wheels:Didn't you hear him say the reason they kept the cows in the shed was so they could monitor any bullying?
while maybe this way ..has given you the strength
That's much too fancy for me
So you lovely Southern ladies, and wonderful West Coast ladies - here's some 'big dog' licks coming your way!
Age 22 I got married and age 23 I got into Roehampton Uni to study Psychology. I then discovered I was pregnant so decided not to go. I had my daughter Jane age 24 and my son Tim age 25. My babies were and are delicious. They were also quite difficult as children, constant illness, which we now discover was mostly allergy based. These experiences lead me to the world of alternative medicine, so I started studying Homeopathy in 1992. In 1993 my dad, who’d been very violent during my childhood, but who I was now just getting to know, killed himself by blowing off his head. Very traumatic – I don’t think I’ve managed to touch my feelings around that yet – I will in time.
I kind of just threw together what we had lying around. We're headed out of town again so it was a last ditch effort to clear out the refrigerator. It was either this or the six pack of Guinness and a triple stacked baloney sandwich.
Another traditional tale with a holiday twist! As the oven door opens, Gingerbread Man leaps out, shouting “Flour Power”! Then the cookie crusader takes off to save the world and sweet adventures commence!
Nah, time to test if I knew what I knew.
Grateful Dead
“Universities have become bureaucracies with countless meetings. … I suppose it is important for a university to put down roots, but it must not permit society to swallow it up. One example of what I mean is the growing tendency to desert the classics. From the perspective of corporations that think only in terms of money, and of government agencies that only value power, the classics must seem of absolutely no use. And from the perspective of students whose goal is to succeed in this kind of distorted world, ancient-language grammar books must seem useless. But I think that a nation of corporations, government agencies, and a university educational system that becomes distorted in this way is sure to collapse. In such a nation, means (money and power) become the ultimate end, and people become animals that seek only food and conquest. … But to be human is to value language. And, without thoroughly understanding the history of the human race’s search for truth and beauty … we cannot expect to be able to make our future ‘more human’ than it is now.”
5. Knott's Berry Farm
Festival was Friday. We had two days to stop a Nordic demigod evil overlord—overlady, overbeing, whatever—from blowing up a nuclear power plant, possibly destroying half an island full of revelers in the process, and creating an Interdimensional Gap through which she can bring the rest of her giant relatives to set up housekeeping where the Faerie Catholic Church didn’t have the power to control them. In other words, two days until Hel broke loose.
When I left, so did the woman who was willing to stay up with you when you couldn’t sleep at night, listen to the same stories over and over again just because they made you feel alive when you told them, fight your battles for you even though you’re capable of fighting them yourself, push you when you weren’t reaching your full potential; you lost a woman who was willing to be your girlfriend, your best friend and most importantly your partner. I was capable of making you better because I loved you enough to see how much you truly deserved.
With the help of sidechaining you can retain the raw power that your track should have.
I had less, just a copy of World of stories, some flyers, business cards and some of the Daqueran buttons that featured my drawing.
Word on the skreet is it's a new market that will feature an eat in area an specialize in Asian items. The skreet also claims this new business is a spin-off of current Quasi-health/fruit market, Nam's.
Because QOTSA deserves a much longer and bombastic introduction, I’ll just write about Wolfmother and call it a day. Wolfmother is an Australian group of guitar-savvy kangaroos formed in Sydney, in the I-can’t-believe-it’s-been-more-than-a-fucking-decade-ago year of 2000. Unfortunately, the band has suffered a ton of line-up changes (being Australia, I guess that they were frequently engaged in epic battles with giant spiders while touring), so I won’t bother with it. Knowing that Andrew Stockdale is the lead singer is enough.
things to bring to the pool:
12027-2007
Hello there :) Hope you all had a great week! My laptop is sooo messed up right now so you will have to bare with me. It takes me forever to do a post with it like this. So my posts will probably be mostly pictures, lol. At least until I can get it fixed. But just wanted to share my surprise pressies that I got from Dave for Easter. He knows how much I love this time of year, he is my little Easter bunny :)
It will be socially destabilized as race-based, ethnic politics comes to define Canadian society and the Canadian political scene even more so.
"Скажи нам, як тобі здається: Чи дозволено давати кесареві податок, чи ні?"
Aloha!
For he played the long game in this war,
That first pick is so crucial for the Bills this year. They need to hit it head on and come away with a winner. They continue to disappoint fans and themselves year in and year out because we do not have a front office with a brain or an owner.
My husband read on Lonely Planet (we love this guide-book!) that Wine Bar on the 23rd floor of Sheraton Hotel was a famous place for Ho Chi Minh City’s night view, so we decided to give it a try. If you are wondering if it’s worth it or not, you won’t miss much if you skip this one. To my sweet husband’s credit, it was definitely lovely and the view after it got dark was pretty. We went there during the happy hour, which many bars in Dong Khoi area do, but we didn’t realize that it required to order “2 of the SAME cocktails” to get a happy hour pricing. Since my husband and I ordered different drinks, we didn’t get happy hour prices and our drinks ended up being $10 each that night. So much for the view! What I had is called “Love Potion No. 9″. Holy Cow, that was strong! There was no way I could’ve ordered another one of my drink. I would’ve ended up on the floor. My husband called it Pepto-Bismol. Thanks, honey, that’s quite appetizing!
Enjoy the pictures everyone, courtesy of DeStefano's SteakHouse in Williamsburg, Brooklyn, on the corner of Leonard Street and Conselyea Street.
Well, last night, she decided to prey on me, for a change. She's wanting to start her own blog, which would be amazing since she has excellent writing skills. But, I'm now living in constant fear that the topic of most of her posts would be me, so I play my Mom card and just tell her, "No, it's the internet, and it's not safe." So, for now, I win. I did hear something last night that sent chills down my spine. I was hanging out in her room, and after one little incident, she quickly said, "Oh, Mom! I'm soooooo going to blog about this! Everyone in the world will know the truth!"
Tom (re vampires): “You don’t know what these people are like.”
or one ANYTHING
We spent eight days on Cozumel, including those spent traveling. We had only one mission: dive. We spent six days aboard La Nena, the dive boat owned by Cristina, who actually went to graduate school with my Dad at Rice University back in the 80′s (small world). After graduate school she headed back to Mexico, fell in love with the Caribbean and in 1987 moved to Cozumel. You can probably see why I like this woman. Besides living the life of an educated dive bum, she is warm, welcoming and hilarious. Her husband Luis also happens to give the funniest dive instruction I have heard yet. He usually only goes diving when there are inexperienced or resort divers on the boat. He had me sit in on two of these briefings telling me that it was “good for my professional diving education.” With much animation he sits his group down and tells them, “You think you are certified but you know nothing. I am going to tell you the things you need to know so that YOU DON’T DIE. I don’t like it when my divers die!” He then proceeds to go through airspaces and squeezes, buoyancy and choking. ”I have water in my mask but that water is not going up my nose and I am not choking. Why?” “You’re not inhaling through your nose?” “NO” “You’re blowing out through your nose?” ”….NO! I am looking DOWN. If you have water in your mask and look UP then the water goes down your nose and you choke. So, you have water in your mask, don’t look up. Clear the water like we practiced and you’ll be fine.” His advice as to how to keep water out of your mask? “Poker face! No smiling at the fishes. Women, no smiling at me.”
The big grey rat ran as fast as he could. Then he thought how very tired he was getting. "What's the use of hurrying?" he said to himself. "The little brown beetle can not possibly win. If I were racing with somebody who could really run it would be very different." Then he started to run more slowly but every time his heart beat it said, "Hurry up! Hurry up!" The big grey rat decided that it was best to obey the little voice in his heart so he hurried just as fast as he could.
“Is she a cat lover?”
Dr Helen E Lees, Research fellow, School of Education, Stirling University.
Interestingly its a song thats not sung as often these days. We tend to sing more ‘nice, loving’ songs that are designed to not offend, or not put off a person who may be seeking to know more about the christian life.
We drove to Plano to stock up at Kegs and Barrels. You can either be proud of me or ashamed of me for only spending $45, including ice. But I didn't bring a large enough ice chest!
I was intimidated by writing as a British Asian because I wanted to be accurate and respectful, but also wanted to avoid liberal squeamishness, which is itself a kind of stereotyping. I researched by interviewing British Asians who had grown up here in the seventies, particularly those who (like Satish) came here from Uganda or, also like him, grew up in a very white community. They were remarkably generous with their stories, some of which I’ve used in the novel. They described a wide range of experiences; there was the woman who (along with Kelly Holmes!) was one of only two ethnic-minority children in her village, and was still hurt by how her family had been treated (hissed injunctions to ‘Go Home!’ at a dance in the village hall). And there was the Birmingham Sikh who’d had a high old time growing up alongside his white mates, and recalled begging to be allowed to spectate at a National Front march! Then an Asian friend shared her memories of family gatherings, helping me with those tiny details which, I hope, put the reader right in the heart of the family.
BF: No, they asked for money afterwards.
½ cup raw pumpkin seeds
With every successful edit, a manuscript (and its author) becomes bolder and more confident and seeing that happen is the most rewarding part of all. But it’s also kind of sad to know that if the process is working then each edit is bringing us closer to the moment when we have to say goodbye.
A judge has dismissed a significant lawsuit by federal regulators who want to force DTE Energy to install more pollution controls at Michigan’s largest coal-fired power plant.
Being "passable," what does that mean? Most would say it means being able to pass as a cisgendered woman in most situations; that nobody would think you were not TG. And that is something that very rarely happens. Most of us have something that is going to be incongruous. Hands that are too big, an Adam's apple that shows up, shoulders a bit too broad...So no, you're probably not going to pass. But you probably do look very feminine at a glance, and even beautiful. People give you the respect they give most women, because you present enough clues to trigger that response. It's something I believe we all have, and it works most of the time.
Okada men do this every day, that is, they show their well honed idiocy every day as they get on those bikes and weave through traffic without care or any concern in the world. I slammed on my breaks and cringed at the thought of what or who I may have just run over. People began to gather. And like a swarm of bees, okada after okada after okada began to stop and park and join in what was steadily becoming a circus act, no one even bothered to pay any attention to the lifeless body wedged somewhere between my rear and front tyres!
Fri 3rd Feb – Carlisle, Carlisle Folk & Blues Club
The use of armed drones by the U.S. to attack defenceless civilians and assassinate individuals is a form of terrorism designed to terrorise the population to achieve political objectives. It is the worst terrorism ever hurled on defenceless population and must be condemned.
We had a potluck lunch! Our new president is a Chef. He made the best cake. I will share the recipe someday. You mix it and bake it all in the same pan, and it was warm when he brought it over. I have asked him for the recipe for the May Newsletter (which I have not begun working on.)
Alife was without question one of the more daring and innovative streetwear lines in a genre that was already seen as something of a loose cannon in a world that was still recovering from 3XL’s t-shirts or mainly concerned with SB Dunks and Levi Shrink to Fit’s. The line was a statement of color blocking mastery, with the occasional experiments in ridiculous logo jacking, Cookie Monster eyes, polka dot crews, and impressive heather’s and basics. Basically, it was everything a great streetwear line should be, irreverent, brash, innovative and immaculately conceived. If you saw someone else with Alife in 2006, you know they put in groundwork to get their hands on a piece.
In the final stage of the grand ceremony the new head of state came out to the Cathedral Square, one of the most landmark sites of the Kremlin, where he observed a parade by the presidential regiment and the Ivan the Great bell tower chimed its bells.
When the communication became inconsistent, he became more distant. That fed into all of my insecurities. He seemed to be “busy” all the time. He had kids and a demanding job, so I wanted to show him that I could hang in there with him. I wanted to show him that I was independent and that I wasn’t really needy. But at the same time, I didn’t want to let go. I didn’t want to be abandoned.
Explosion, fireball reported in Nevada, California
Some boxes for collection gather dust.
Intoxicating.
- that most museums in London are FREE and open everyday of the week!
I am currently finding out what I can do to become a certified lactation consultant. I don't want to get my hopes up yet...but I am very excited to see if this works out.
Then the thunder roars and the lightening flashes
There's so much I cannot see,
The fifth figure in this set is Taffy, holding his shotgun at the ready in a two-handed grip. He is a rather unremarkable figure. He's not badly sculpted but he doesn't really stand out from the crowd.
That said, I don't think that this idea of "sisterhood" necessarily excludes men- I know that sounds stupid, but hear me out. This fashion is devoted to the feminine side of life; therefore, regardless of sex, it seems to me that anyone who engages in a feminine fashion could identify himself as of the female gender whenever he dons those clothes while still being of the male sex (remember, 'sex' means biological identity and 'gender' means social identity). I also imagine that someone who is so comfortable with femininity that he will wear lolita would not be adverse to considering himself one of a sisterhood, whatever he identifies his gender as.
She stormed downstairs demanding to know where I ‘hid her pads.’ After listening to her rant and rave for five minutes, I yelled back—-which my husband said I have to stop doing. He said I need to ‘talk to my kids in a respectful manner.’ Then , as he says our children would not give us parents a bad attitude, and yell at us.
reaching out to hit the snooze button,
Seton’s history stretches back to St. Vincent de Paul, who was born in 1581 in France, to a poor family. He was ordained as a priest in 1600, but in 1605, while on a sea voyage, was captured by pirates and sold into slavery. Two years later his owner’s wife helped him escape.
Then I discovered that my storage box fit perfectly underneath the chair.
It would contain a pretty dining area
All of a sudden, one of the kids fell, as is to be expected in a race where your entire lower half is inside a fabric bag. It had happened to me many times during my own sack race, as my green “participaction” ribbon reminded me. But as I watched the boy get back up, something was different. He stepped out of his sack and walked back to the start line. Then, he calmly got back into his sack and started down the race course again. I watched in stunned silence with a bite of sandwich sitting in my half open mouth as I watched him fall again, go back to the start line and begin all over. Didn’t he know this was a race? The whole point is to get to the finish line first! How are you supposed to win if you keep turning back every time you fall?
Do you have any writers or stories that influence your work? I’ve never ever said I want to write like so-and-so, but of course there have been books I have particularly enjoyed. One is White Oleander by Janet Fitch. There are some passages in there that I read over and over, they are so well written and speak to my heart. Sometimes I pull the book off the shelf and simply read the three or four sections I marked. I’ve also read Jane Eyre several times and really enjoyed Madeline L’Engle, Ursula K. Leguin, Patrick O’Brian, the entire Harry Potter series, The Hobbit (can’t wait for the first movie in December) and The Lord of the Rings.
‘I pray to the God within me for the strength to ask Him the real questions.’”
There was a time when I would dance and sing.
7:00 PM Jessica Jensen + Alexander Berardi
Now the latest, is that some streets in Shanghai core areas are just like any North American yuppified area. Do I need to experience that when I can get a similar experience just by wandering down Robson St. in Vancouver, BC with over 30% Asian-Canadians in the city? Or in the suburb of Richmond where the population is now 60% Asian-Canadian.
The process of healing has taken twenty-six years, when at the age of thirty-five, I realized that I had not been the problem.
manuel
I tear into the first box while I let the kids open the other one. The girls just start squealing with joy! (I'm thinking ohhh...it must be good!
"Eight Miles High" is about the Byrds' airline flight to London in August 1965 and their subsequent UK concert tour. Gene Clark started writing the lyrics while the Byrds were touring the U.S. with the Rolling Stones later that year.
Top Maropea
Some final shots…
Similarly, gnu atheism shouldn’t be presented as an intellectual position. Repeatedly emphasize their hostility to organized religion as the source of their disbelief. It helps if you acknowledge that there are some legitimate reasons for this hostility – shows you to be fair and balanced while leaving aside those pesky ontological matters.
Enough typing for now, stay tuned for more adventures with the Parents!
My attempt at knitting a shawl, slow going as I have so many irons in the fire, is snuggled in a basket by my chair. I hoped to have it ready by the time the first frost nipped my cheek on my early morning walks through the gardens.
Daphne – 88 (32.47%)
I have only used this a few times and I haven't used this at all in a game with a Cleric but this is how I would deal with their healing spells: Cure Light Wounds would eliminate one Light Wound, or make a serious wound a Light wound, or make a dying character merely seriously wounded. A character healed this way would not loose the limb, and would be only faintly scarred. The Cure Serious Wound spell would eliminate completely a light wound or a serious wound and would make a dying character only lightly wounded.
Ok, imagine you are the Creator making the first human being. You scoop up some of the stuff of the Earth. It is made up of some pretty hard things. You grab some calcium and magnesium. Let’s see, these would be great for creating bones and and for the mineralization of bones. We’ll stick that in the middle of the human structure. Also, calcium and magnesium are good for muscle contractions and nerve impulses. That should work.
Meet Patricia Krentcil, an (what I would call) “extreme tanner” and mother to a five-year-old daughter. And one who has been arrested and charged with Second Degree Child Endangerment. Why?
All was well in theory until Charles Schwab Inc. and the board of directors determined that going after big money would make the firm more profitable – it was exactly what every other firm on the street was doing so why not Schwab? They sold their soul and the 1% got wealthy, the 99% (including employees who were not directors or unit presidents/vp) got stock option rights to buy shares of Schwab at a discount because paying employees what they were worth would not be profitable. Unless you were the 5% who made Schwab a life career, you took a bath in very dirty water about 1998 and forward as Schwab, now wealthy like other houses on the street, began to disband employees over profits. I had left the firm (I felt Schwab was losing its mojo and cache) to pursue a larger dream – Peace Corps. I, like most employees, who worked for Schwab during the go-go 90′s took a cold bath of reality and in realizing I was underpaid when I worked for them (remember the stock options). I later took another bath when stocks went down and I needed to sell. Schwab, like every other firm was also affected by the most recent Wall Street and banking debacle, in spite of how it is worded on Wikipedia.
Kuya Joel – You have been kind to me, thank you so much.
November 19 - John Neville, actor ("The Adventures of Baron Munchausen"), 86
It poured an opaque, golden colour and had a very pleasant aromatic nose of light peach, grassy citrus and the slightest hint of malt. It was in the taste department that this beer really came into it's own with it's fruit basket of flavours.
Anyways, my point is that we (me) beat ourselves up over how much it looks like others are able to accomplish without realizing that the pretty pictures only tell half the story. In reality (and I hope other bloggers can attest to this), for every beautifully photographed room, there's a not-so-pretty pile of stuff down the hall, or in the corner the picture doesn't show. For example, at the same time my new kitchen looked like this:
The Wayne County Prosecutor’s Office Animal Protection Unit, formed in 2008, investigated the cases.
A lot of people should be sent to jail for engaging in this fraud, but they will not. The victims remain as does the drumbeat of lies about greenhouse gas emissions or claims of ocean acidification.
Symptoms differ, depending on whether the infection affects the lower (bladder and urethra) or upper (kidneys and ureters) parts of the urinary tract. The Symptoms of Lower Urinary Tract Infection are dysuria (burning on passing urine), frequency (frequent need to pass urine) and urgency (compelling need to urinate). The urine can be cloudy with an offensive odour. In older men, generalized symptoms such as confusion and incontinence can be present. Urine Infections are much commoner in the elderly, due to poor bladder emptying, an enlarged prostate, or incontinence associated with Stroke or Dementia. The Symptoms of Upper Urinary Tract Infection are the same as lower tract symptoms plus loin (flank) pain, fever and chills. The patient is likely to be ill and might require hospital admission.
Dafydd Morgan
This documentation is a must read. It describes for all types of work in France the benefits and limitations like vacation days, your rights if you should quit or be laid off, etc. A quick google search will lead you to legifrance.gouv.fr where you can read this information for free (in French).
Looking around for discussion prompts, I noticed a large red sack on the floor. I figured it was his, but it didn’t hurt to ask. “So Santa, is that your gift bag that you pack around with you?” As if there was a chance one of the other guests would come bearing a large, garishly red velvet sack with items bulging out of it.
Finally, adding more premiums than originally planned offers limited flexibility for a client. This is because the death benefit is usually level in nature. An increase in cash value would extend the year in which cash value would hit zero, but offers little hope for developing supplemental funds that can be accessed for emergencies.
What is the perfect storm of drunkenness? When the NCAA basketball tournament meets St. Patrick’s Day meets SXSW and the result is swirling shit storm of drunks blowing through downtown Austin. (Not that there is anything wrong with this).
I'm not sure why I picked on competition for a theme, as I'm not really a competitive sort of person, but I think it does make for an interesting theme. One that can have many interpretations.
But I eat strange food. Ethiopian food is unlike anything else in the world. Sometimes it is delicious, but most times it is very mediocre. Other times, it is so incredibly bad that I consider burning down every plant that grows whatever the hell is in ‘gunfo’
Last week was crazy-busy. I had family in town as well as juggling recipe development for a client, a presentation for another, a fundraiser cooking class, and a column due to Fine Cooking Magazine. I also wrote a piece about my concerns over Wicked Tuna, a TV show about bluefin tuna fishing on NatGeo for CNN.com, and other work to do in preparation for several other upcoming projects. Then, on Friday afternoon, we drove down to Bluffton, GA and spent the weekend at White Oak Pastures with the Harris family.
Drag: I see. But you. You succeeded?
here's some happy photos that get me in the mood to smile:
What if you don’t have insurance? What if you have a stroke, heart attack, or some other serious manifestation of untreated sleep apnea? They say you could stop breathing and die.
For those needing a reminder, or maybe these pictures will convince you to make a fire soon, here’s how to make s’mores.
Police & Thieves Radio Advert #2
Even under today’s circumstances, a lot of businesses are looking for workers and they don’t have them. They’re not as well-trained here.
I am SO EXCITED!
In this recipe I used tau kan as a vegetarian replacement for anchovies which is a vital ingredients in making sambal for nasi lemak (coconut milk rice).
"He was easily the best math teacher I have ever had," wrote Deborah Anzalone Esposito, whose father Joe Anzalone was the varsity football coach during most of our tenure. "He explained concepts very thoroughly and precisely without ever getting annoyed with the class for `not getting it.' He would simply smirk and go through it again."
It has often been charged that the Bible can’t be trusted because people can make it say anything they want it to say. This charge would be true if the Bible were not the objective Word of God, if it were simply a wax nose, able to be shaped, twisted, and distorted to teach one’s own precepts. The charge would be true if it were not an offense to God the Holy Spirit to read into sacred Scripture what is not there. However, the idea that the Bible can teach anything we want it to is not true if we approach the Scriptures humbly, trying to hear what the Bible says for itself.
Tuesday, April 5 - Republic New Orleans - New Orleans, LA
The sources for this article are footnoted in my book, Big Oil & Their Bankers… I have been including footnotes in my more recent articles. Thanks for your comment.
Witchcraft, spell casting, voodoo...yeah, I'm a spooky bitch. WATCH OUT! LOL! Seriously? I have a whole room dedicated to the metaphysical. There be bones, herbs, candles, books, incense, and other curiosities.
And sometimes it costs nothing…what I really like is the site’s Free Friday feature, which presents titles which can be download for no cost at all. This particular week offered several recipe books available for your Kindle. Gotta love anything that’s absolutely free, huh?
6. Big Noyd - Freezers snippet
Belgain fritters: 6/10. Not as good as Kua'aina fries. Those are (excuse me for this ridiculous and now very unPC phrase) the bomb!
He continued: “I cannot believe that there is anything more or anything different that I could have done and that would have been more successful.”
I had to have this pattern!
June 11
The schedule for the Matric Revision Programme 2010 (Mondays and Wednesdays, 7-8pm):
It's not that conventional photographs are in anyway wrong. I reject the idea that journalistic or documentary photography (photos looking to reveal something essential about a subject) is irrelevant or is necessarily a dramatic part of an arching political agenda. Sometimes, as with the Abu Ghraib incident or with Roger Clemens’ steroid case, photographs can be of vast importance politically and socially, but most of the time, photographers settle for doing their best just make people slow down to actually notice and think about what they are looking at. Welling is great at doing this, great in delaying our ultimate judgment about what a photograph is or is of, facilitating the self-conscious mechanism of looking. If this makes people better, which should an artist’s idealistic hope, we receive an added bonus.
Similarly, sometimes when we struggle in our lives, it may seem painful to someone who is watching. But those very struggles actually make us strong and powerful. Many people ask, ‘Why does God allow us to suffer?’ We can learn from this boy; if he had allowed the caterpillar to suffer a little more, then it would have soared to the sky, flown from one flower to another and been appreciated by the world for its colors and beauty.
As you can see we are now doing short You-tube Videos to help you on your way.
Today I met with a nano-brew brewer, Tom Horst, Crystal Springs Brewing Co., 100 barrels in 2011. I asked "Why can? Is it merely because it is cheaper?"
Where do I go to learn what I want to know?
This is “The Searchers” with vampires in the place of Native Americans and the Priest in the place of John Wayne. They took my favorite Western and placed it in a post apocalyptic setting.
There's much to say about this: Too much for a single blog post. If it's really true that gangbangers from the United States are responsible for half the killing going on in Juarez, maybe it's Mexico that should be pushing to build a wall! Unfortunately, the border economy is too intertwined for that to be a real solution. At a minimum, though, maybe TDCJ's gang unit should share its lists with Mexico's immigration authorities and enhance parole supervision for gang members in border regions.
"Train up a child in the way he should go:
Let me know if you try it!
Twin 2: I made that for you and you're not gonna finish it?
Publication Date: April 24, 2012
Enroll myself back into college-- for good.
ANDIE & BEN
“Republicans hate the poor and love big business.”
You are the love of my life
lang syne silent
His neck was no longer as firm; the skin sagged in places. Below the jaw too he was growing a pouch. The years had not only gnawed at their lives, they had eaten away at his hairline too. She was no longer surprised at the insipidity of her emotions when she looked at his face. It had been a slow process. Day by day the love had withered, dying a silently screaming death, taking its last breath on the day Zaahid had left for good.
Nokia Bluetooth Stereo Headset (BH-504)
Prince Prospero, from the original story, technically owns the city while hiding in his own palace, ignoring the plight of the people. He is a terrifying presence although he is only in the book a little. Instead our focus is on main character Araby, daughter of the inventor of the masks and only half-alive after losing her twin brother years earlier. The only time she feels anything is when she goes to the Debauchery Club with her friend April. This is also the place that leads her to two very different boys.
Sometimes, a blood clot in the heart or aorta travels to a cerebral artery. A transient ischemic attack (TIA) is a “mini-stroke” caused by a temporary deficiency of blood supply to the brain, or by a blood clot briefly blocking a cerebral artery.
South Ohio (Cincinnati), Central and Southwest Kentucky (Hopkinsville, KY) , Evansville Indiana, all the way north to the tip of Michigan (Frederic, MI) / Grand Rapids, MI……
Soy Sauce – this is a Chinese seasoning of which there are two varieties, light and dark. The light one is lighter in colour with a low viscosity, and it is extremely salty. This type is more expensive than dark and used as a condiment at the table. Dark soy sauce is deep in colour with a higher viscosity, and sweeter in flavour (usually due to additives such as caramel colour and/or molasses). Dark soy sauce is used more frequently in cooking.
Despite repeated attempts to claim that Ron Paul hasn’t won any states, those following the real delegate counts knew the truth all along, – the non-binding straw polls meant absolutely nothing.
If the show was supposed to be a look inside the horrible walls of ad firms that refer to themselves as being ‘like a family’ but behave like any other corporation then there might be something worth watching here, but that’s not what this show is. This is a reality competition and while the show itself works well enough – it’s somewhat compelling and it manages to create suspense out of an otherwise completely unsuspenseful situation – but the show is populated with so many irritating people that it doesn’t matter how watchable a show is when it’s this unlikeable.
You are in our thoughts
I used mainly acrylic paint, with oil and chalk pastels, too. I was trying to figure out to how to seal chalk pastels enough to do my normal glossy sealer on top, and I found that using the ol' tried and true cheap hairspray did the trick! I just did lots of light coats of aerosol hairspray, and it sealed it enough to be able to paint a liquid sealer over the top of it. I was glad that it worked! The situation was making me wish I had one of my college professors to call up and get the answer :)
Jim probably won’t mind me telling you that he bears an uncanny resemblance to Kenny Rogers – music, indeed, is one of his great passions and we’d often discuss the relative merits of Peter Case, Johnny Cash or Joy Division on the way to dinner in Oxford back when he was working and living in the UK. His other hobby is art – he paints and draws whenever the opportunity presents itself, and it was during a conversation last week that he reminded me of a project he’d been involved in a couple of years back in Ireland.
What's been the most memorable feedback you've gotten from teachers and kids?
“We had a contract,” she explained. “He skipped.”
So for progress's sake, grammar will wait. Instead I am focusing on content, on story, on story telling. There is much to learn in this area, and I understand what I read about it. The ideas don't confuse me and elude my grasp.
Sometimes individuals can’t control the type of feedback that they receive. What happens then? One study found people were more likely to withdraw from spouses who saw them more or less favorably than they saw themselves (Ritts & Stein, 1995). Other studies have shown that individuals experience anxiety when they are faced with, and can not avoid, feedback that is in strong contradiction to their self-views (Pinel & Swann, 1996). This is called disintegration anxiety, and is characterized by a feeling that something is terribly wrong (just like in my dancing debacle).
Mormon Mommy Bloggers are pegged as being perfect, eternal optimists with their "nothing goes wrong" attitudes. And that is simply not true. Well, some of us like to paint rosier pictures than others, but I would say that we choose to focus on the positives in our lives. That is what makes us happier in the long run. Just ask Oprah...I've done my share of complaining on my blog. Holy Flippin' Fetch? Seriously! I have...
We have some winners around the Half-dozen household!
And then the couple walked down the aisle and up the hill into the banquet hall in a shower of falling, blowing leaves. Nature's send-off.
A blind submission to the commands of the abbot, however absurd, or even criminal, they might seem, was the ruling principle, the first virtue of the Egyptian monks; and their patience was frequently exercised by the most extravagant trials. They were directed to remove an enormous rock; assiduously to water a barren staff that was planted in the ground, till, at the end of three years, it should vegetate and blossom like a tree; to walk into a fiery furnace; or to cast their infant into a deep pond: and several saints, or madmen, have been immortalised in monastic story by their thoughtless and fearless obedience.
Calcium does not only live in dairy. You can get lots of calcium from almonds, spinach, broccoli, peas, white beans etc...
* rootdev:/sbus@1,f8000000/esp@0,800000/sd@3,0:a
first up is January and focusing on vitality: boosting my energy.
5.Add the baking powder and salt at the end and mix well.
Indeed, anyone who has tried living in a genuine commune has probably come across at least one example of the phenomenon in question. While everyone else is giving to the commune to the best of his ability, the freeloader gives as little as possible, and almost invariably ends up taking a lot more than he needs. Because freeloaders are unusually shameless, it is pointless to try to shame them into observing the principles underlying the communism of everyday life. Because, by definition, the communism of everyday life is an informal system, freeloaders cannot be sanctioned by law. (Communism of Everyday Life) Conservatives have grown...
05: Aerosol – Lazy Sunday (04:20)
5) FB or tweet about the giveaway, make sure to link back to this post. Leave a separate comment saying you did.
HENRY PERCY
How much difference do you think it would make in the world if you had that kind of availability to God? That kind of intentionality towards others?
Rnd 13) ch1, sc in each st around, do NOT join, ch7,turn
I have been so off my game of late that it ain't even funny. I tidied up my craft space (that alone should have been the first sign that something was rotten in Denmark), virtually trawled some of the most crafty places in the known world, and willfully indulged in a little craft retail therapy. I even, out of utter desperation, went on to Pinterest and I still had nothing...zip, zilch, nada, not even a rat's. Crazy, huh? I can painfully conclude that my mojo has officially left the building, hence the reason I have been AWOL from my blog for so long. Yesterday (that would be my "Monday" Down Under) I decided to put my back into it and see if I could get out of this fugue of non-creativity. After many hours of faffing about, this is the card that I came up with. Not much to show really, but I finally feel inspired to get crafty moving forward. Phew!
Should survival be achieved, the problem remains that we need a fundemental shift in our own perceptions and the reinstitution of basic societal values to keep us treading safer waters.
I was now in the possession of a great story that I was convinced would get snapped up. I sent it to one more agent. A couple of months went by and then she replied with…
“Ne?”
"Well Behaved Women Seldom Make History" can certainly be used as inspiration for women, but it can also apply to artists or anyone for that matter inspired to take a journey off the beaten path. We have to learn not to just settle for how things are, but to challenge and persist in what we believe is right, in what we want to achieve...even if we ruffle a few feathers along the way!
I just want to say this was a great song offered up this week by Cameron. Soundtracks always offer great music. For more information on the 100 Word song you can check out Lance’s My Blog Can Beat Up Your Blog. My mind went a million places with this one, but I settled on some social commentary. This is a stand alone entry.
9.seial killer part two
Has the MACC investigation team been suspended?
¼ cup brandy
1 teaspoon of butter or oil
139th: North Korea (97.50)
The Liefde wen campaign is a non-profit organization, still very much in the beginning phase. This campaign has already generated a major hype amongst young South Africans. Bouwer elaborates a bit more on this brainchild, “I’m busy registering it as a non-profit organization, and let me tell you, there is heaps of admin. The goal of Liefde Wen, is to be a non-profit organization that lends a hand to many different projects. It’s only in the beginning phase – and we still have a long way to go before it is fully up and running. The idea is to use the organization to get involved with various projects, for example children’s homes, etc. I don’t just want to give money to these projects, but actively get people involved to help and create kind of create a culture of giving. The campaign is also promoted by an already popular clothing range, consisting of t-shirts and caps. I want to use the profits generated from the sales of the clothing to help assist the projects Liefde wen takes on. When I die one day I don’t want people to remember me for the songs I had on radio. I’d rather have them remember me for the difference I tried to make. Life is more than music and catchy lyrics. The beggar on the street doesn’t care whether my singles are played on radio. It’s in a way so irrelevant.”
Paul was rejoicing, not that he was receiving gifts, but that the Philippians were being blessed, for “it is more blessed to give than to receive.” (Acts 20:35)
I imagine what it’d be like to have him, in our lives now, sober. I don’t know why, I don’t like to imagine things to be the way they’re really not. But sometimes I’m sentimental, or just desperate for a daddy to take all the hurt away with a hush. I fell in love once, and the man broke my heart after nine years. We have a daughter together. He continues to hurt me, and yet in it I also hurt myself by the feelings of rejection and abandonment again. But I sometimes pretend I had a dad now that would tell me how great and beautiful I was, and that I deserved to be treated with only love and respect. I pretend now that he tells me that, so that I can believe it myself. I believe I have a dad out there, who could guide me into love, and assure me that it’s there, that it exists, and that when you’re really loved, those that love you never, ever back out. Because love is stronger than that. That’s what he teaches me, now that he’s gone, leaning back into the alysum, pink and white petals falling, reflecting in his eyes, so quiet you can hear them softly caress his cheeks and his shoulders. He is smiling, his eyes are clear. He is with us, we are in the petals, kissing him.
Team Chen, going over the strategy
Clinging to
Kaitlyn goes on to remark on the reinforcement of cultural norms created by the female warriors and how their primitive nature made them both “explainable” and “alluring”. She presents many unusual contrasts to explain her point and ends up with a project that is both respectable and intriguing.
“It’s okay! Eye! I’m fine!” Thumbs up. Get up. Start across the road to the chop bar.
The only means of communication around then was the one telephone in the neighborhood that belonged to Dave Campbell. He was fairly well off and owned the neighborhood grocery store. Their house phone was used by everyone around. Very few people owned cars either, so it was an overall situation of doing what was necessary to carry on with one's life. "God helps those who help themselves" was a maxim everyone lived by.
Both gifts from L! Such good taste that man has. The silver one is by Fossil, and the other is handmade (it's sterling silver with semi-precious stones). The stone cuff never stays on - it's too big on my wrist and just slides off. Today I decided to just tie it onto my wrist with some black ribbon.
TM: I’m an incumbent. You can expect exactly the same kind of stuff from me in CSM7 as you got in CSM6, the most effective CSM in history.
While I have certainly developed a Lost City-ish sensibility over years and years of Dungeon Mastering, my initial training was via more tournament type modules like C1 Hidden Shrine of Tomoachan and S2 White Plume Mountain. Thus it took me awhile to grasp the pleasures to be had in player-NPC negotiation and party alliances with in-game groups. In The Lost City, Moldvay brilliantly lays out the basics of such an approach, thereby "introducing" it as a (potentially) core aspect of the game. I only wish I had obtained, read, and played this module earlier in my career.
6. Create a more 'European' style for myself.
General Geldenhuys wrote the book - with the assistance of 62 others Generals, Officers, and soldiers, because they felt the need to restore the honour of the SADF, as well as the true history of the Border War in South West Africa (Namibia). The General added that the SADF were the victors in the war, but - “they who were defeated are telling the stories... Our soldiers are not getting the respect they deserve.”
She trailed off, trying to remember what she was supposed to say next.
over the heavy waters that roll beyond the world,
This was such an easy and nice book. I totally loved it!
Some argue that the increasing the rate of innovation in the U.S. is counterproductive to manufacturing employment. If technology means that fewer workers can produce the same amount of goods, then, that progress will increase productivity. Yet economic theory and evidence, contradict this argument. The evidence suggests just the opposite: that productivity growth has not led to job losses in manufacturing; instead it has led to job gains. Economic theory states that even though a productivity increase means that fewer workers are needed to produce a given quantity of output, the productivity increase also allows product prices to be lower, increasing the size of the product market. The larger market means that firms will need to hire more workers. The additional hiring will offset the short-term job loss. Therefore, the overall impact of an increase in productivity is usually to increase employment rather than reduce it.
Last summer I bought fabric to recover some blah brown throw pillows in the living room, but being without a sewing machine, the project never really got off the ground. Well, last weekend Mr. Thirdrow was out of town so I set up shop in the living room and went to town. Here’s how I took our throw pillows from blah brown to beautiful. Keep in mind, this isn’t a fancy tutorial and I’m just a beginner, but I believe in you. Give it a try!
Using a round cookie cutter, cut circles out of the fruit leather. The size of the cutter you use will determine how large of a puff you have at the end. For these puffs we used round cutters that were 1/2” to 2” in diameter.
Being gay is not something i chose, or something i suddenly made up, it’s who jesus, the LORD, he blessed me with a different quality, that i embrace, each and every day, and am extremely proud of myself for sharing it with the world.
Published with Blogger-droid v1.6.4
I went to lunch with two women from work the other day. One is approaching 30 years old and is getting married in 3 months. The other is 31 and single, and she’s not very happy about that.
Such a simple yet hopefully effective campaign.
A comparison was made between the USA and Turkey in the percentage usage of smart phones. In last years it was 40% in USA and 10% in Turkey, making Turkey not a profitable market in scope of mobile applications. But last data about Turkey was saying that this number rose to 25% and has huge potential to rise to 50% in near future. This is a trend. It means that this is a chance to concentrate on mobile applications.
Best Storefront Vanilla - Sugar Mama's
I was shocked that these individuals would risk being caught to save my life. I was surprised they didn’t just let me die as I had heard stories of them doing with others who didn’t know when to stop.
So along the same lines as yesterday, if we're thinking outside the home decorating box, using kitchen canisters outside the kitchen... why not use something else outside the kitchen???
...(I had had enough geometry with my quilt-block ones)...
This is a movie which is more about entertaining the audience than it is about blowing them out of their seats. It isn’t a bad thing to be entertained; it’s just that the bar has been set so high by previous Pixar films that it’s almost impossible for any movie to measure up. I suppose it’s not a bad thing for a film company to be victims of their own high standards – and this movie certainly is. It’s not a bad movie, it’s just not a great movie and I guess that’s enough to upset some people in the critical community. I can recommend it without a second thought, just don’t go in expecting too much other than mindless good fun and you’ll enjoy it purely on that level.
Make safe all your goodies,
I’m a pantser through and through. I typically type out a bullet pointed list of ideas, plot points, character notes, and other stuff. Then I go back and add more to the list. Bull’s first line of his chapter is directly from my original brainstormed list.
It's been a long week since the family trip to NH in the outdoors of New England with Scott and Holly and Chace just enjoying each other and all that is great about New England in the summer….Storyland, outdoors, and ice cream. I had intended to upload some ice cream pics as we enjoyed it but wherever we were service was spotty so now i get to showcase it all and more.
We're celebrating Richard's birthday so we move on in search of dessert. A quick scout around the dessert menus in the area leads us to Ash St Cellar. I saw the crazy eyes in Richard when he spotted the chocolate and dart tart on display in the window.
I love you. (John 3:16)
Sever JL, Ellenberg JH, Ley AC. Toxoplasmosis, maternal and pediatric findings in 23000 pregnancies. Pediatrics Jaartal 188; 82; 181-192.
I checked the time, I had 1 hour and 30 minutes before the bus leaves the station. I knew it was a long way but if I ran towards the statue I could just make it. The photo above was the taken from the location I had decided to run for it. I forgot to mention, at the time i was carrying a small over the shoulder bag with my netbook inside. Making the run slightly more difficult.
Very stretchable
I was sobbing.......
P: You’ve said you are on your profile – you’ve selected white.
Form the dough into a 13-inch-long, 3-inch-wide log on the prepared baking sheet. Bake until light golden, about 40 minutes. Cool for 30 minutes.
anger. As we drove home you
Gary’s house was up a dirt road near the bottom of Deception Gulch, at the low end of town, and looked like a giant nest, wooden stilts almost at mid-tree level holding up the house and porch. As soon as I got out of the car, my ears filled with the music of hundreds of birds and the buzzing of thousands of bees in the forty to fifty trees and flowering vines that had been planted closely around the house. This little oasis contrasted with the rest of the barren hillside that contained old mine tailings, remnants of shacks that had fallen down, hundreds of rusted tin cans, and pieces of pipes and bedsprings. There was a crapper on the porch (though not quite an outhouse) and a refrigerator on the patio.
I think that he stands excellent chances of appealing successfully.
I've been told that Ft. Pickens Road within Gulf Islands National Seashore has been closed and may stay so for a few days. Some areas of the road are covered by water and other by approximately 4 feet of sand.
The trip this year was a struggle. Beckett grew incredibly attached to “Unkel Anroo”, but lacked the comprehension to fully understand what “flying home on a plane” meant. Weeks after Andrew left, Beckett berated Jacob and I with questions about where Andrew was, what he was doing and when he was coming home. It was a terribly bittersweet ending to the closeness that had developed between the two.
Hubby and I will be going to get our Christmas tree today, too. So, today I will be making blackberry jam and pulling out our Christmas decorations on my breaks. We will probably put up the tree tomorrow, after letting it sit in a bucket of water overnight to give it a good drink. I will also be making strawberry jam tomorrow.
Does anybody have taken TOEIC test before??
We bear the armor of the Lord
MENLO PARK, Calif., Feb. 29, 2012 /PRNewswire/ — Hiring in professional fields is likely to continue rising in the second quarter, but at a slower pace than forecast for the first quarter, a new Robert Half survey shows. A net 2 percent of executives interviewed for the Robert Half Professional Employment Report plan to add full-time staff in the second three months of 2012, down from 10 percent last quarter. The biggest trend in the survey is the increase in the number of respondents who anticipate no change in hiring activity: 89 percent versus 78 percent last quarter.
Grating the cheese was laborious and a feat of endurance, and it made
The corruption in many of the elite levels of the upper ranks of the Civil Service personnel have the same track record except they simply held government jobs moving up regularly and eventually they are at what I call the convention level. This is the level that invents reasons to hold training sessions or hold a convention for some legal sounding excuse and it is almost always held in Las Vegas, Hawaii, Bermuda, or other vacation Mecca, possibly even the French Riviera, if your GS Level is at a minimum of twelve. Such is more often an inter-department event where almost everybody is a GS 15 or higher. These are the true professional people whose ability to make expenditures is of the highest orders and quite beyond the imagination of mere mortal taxpayers. These are government employees who have government provided chauffeurs driving them around in a Lincoln, Cadillac or even a Mercedes. By the time you get to the highest level of our Federal government you have been rewarded and rated as exemplary at your job for so many years and for levels of work that are often the butt of jokes for comedians performing in the Nation’s Capital. Actually, after having been raised in the suburbs of our Nation’s capital, I am surprised that there are not far more instances of such extravagant and over-the-top malfeasance by our highest level miscreants, sorry, government employees. The sorry thing is many actually do attempt to work diligently and competently, but the ones who are along for the ride give the whole a bad name. The only thing I can recommend we, the tax paying public, can do is to thank those who work in the government at any level when they treat their job and the public they serve with respect and show diligence. Complaining about the others will usually not accomplish anything except supply the water-cooler circle with grist for their comedic mills.
Happy Thursday Everyone!
Welcome to the SXSW edition of Fave Five Food Deals. No badges or RSVPs required.
Right now im fairly sure most people have a phobia or are scared of something in life, may it being heights, death, spiders or scared of being alone. These are the common ones, but thats not what im about.....I have found out that there are some really funny and damn right strange things people are afraid of.....the first one is Melophobia - The Fear of Music???....how on earth can someone have a phobia of something that is all around us in commercials, radio tv everything......Another is Hippopotomonstrosesquippedaliophobia - Which irronically is the fear of Long Words???.....you can just imagaine someone sitting there going 'oh im scared of long words, i kno im going to look up what that is called OH MY GOD NOOOOOOOOOOOOO'....ok the last one ill give u and it just made me laugh because of how stupid it is but its...Arachibutyrophobia - or the fear of getting peanut butter stuck in the roof of your mouth????.....Who comes up with this? THEY ARE JUST TRYIN TO MAKE UP NEW WORDS NOW!!!!
Please continue to pray for Shannon, AJ, and sweet little Josh as they begin to move on. Pray for comfort and healing.
I think we need to see more women breastfeeding their babies in public whether it be in photos or in real life, it should be a sight that everyone in the country sees on a regular basis because until that happens women are always going to feel like they are doing something wrong when they are doing the most natural thing in the world.
No 8 - La Escuela Taqueria This place just opened about 6 months ago. Same owner as Cobras & Matadors (Steve Arroyo) They might win the innovation award for their crispy-skinned white fish taco. Their shredded beef crispy taco is orgasmic. Fun little cozy hip spot.
We had a blast shopping. We always do. And we are terrible at shopping together ... because we are so good at it! New running clothes for all I say! And you could tell I was in post-run celebration mode when I actually had enough oomph in me to put on the sunglasses (very incognito, right?) and go into "that" store to check out a Prefontaine shirt I saw in the window. I may have bought it ... if it wasn't in "that" store. After shopping I had to visit the Coach again to get my things. At one point in the day - as I was trying to sleep on his couch - I caught him smirking. I don't even want to know why! My memory of the night is a bit sketchy. Oops.
Most important thing in making any Korean hotpot is using a good stock. I have seen some people using plain water to this dish. Why rinse out the flavor of Bulgogi with water? Please don't. If you use water, my satisfaction guarantee is VOID!
Unfortunately, the internet is not coming with us tomorrow, it will take another two weeks. I hope to find an alternate means of feeding my habit. Nontheless, it will be sporadic no matter what. Sorry about that. Don't give up on me, for I am wiley and will find a way to post.
America’s solution to black dependency has led to the creation of the largest entitlement culture in world history. Obama’s arrival heightened the belief that blacks were finally going to get their ‘stuff’. These days it’s fairly common to hear a black talk about “Obama money” – As though Obama, alone, created. “Obama money”, as it is called, represents the mindset that expects and demands “‘more and more and more free stuff” - At tax payer expense. In fact, Obama’s 2012 budget is so huge - stuffed with entitlement programs for wounded, helpless, victims – that by year’s end an additional two trillion dollars will be stacked on top of America’s impossible debt.
Finally, I found a player I wanted to interview and waited patiently for my turn, but the minute I opened my mouth, he…wait for it…turned and ran away. I swear I am not making this up. One of only 2 female reporters in the room, and most likely the only hockey newbie, I was getting a little deer-in-the-headlights at this point. I wasn’t new to reporting, but I was certainly new to the mysterious protocol of a pro locker room onto which the entire Canadian media had, apparently descended.
No. Because of one line you can find on many major review sites:
1. If an already highly advanced civilization, they would have found a good tool which can be transport to bring them to explore the whole earth, so, how come, the remnants of civilization are limited to certain areas only?
I love using this palette for work. The soft colors and subtle shimmer are always appropriate and gives me a break from my usual browns. If you love neutrals or simply looking for eyeshadows to wear at work or school, I highly recommend that you check out this palette, as well as the rest of Armani’s Maestro quads.
Please fill me with your Spirit
There are also reports that our man on fire, rVp has a small hamstring problem so he’s gonna miss the encounter against the Rugby boys tomorrow.
I love being able to do almost anything to a house that needs doing.
I know a lot of people believe their children were not born with autism. That some external factor, like vaccines, caused it. I understand others believe that is what happened to their children. However, I am NOT one of those people. I know our story. My son didn’t just change one day. My son has always been Quinn. The independent player, the observer, the detail oriented systematic kid, the quiet one, the scared of change and new situations one, the late bloomer, the never ever slept through the night child, and last but not least, the love of my life. I don’t know if that knowledge has made me feel more at peace, or made me feel more terrified. I think it is a little of both.
The papers I have used are a mixture from Cosmo Cricket, Pink Paisley and Crate Paper. The sentiment is an SRM sticker. The brad is from My Mind's Eye and the ribbon is from The Ribbon Girl. It's rather hard to see in the photo, but I distressed around the black matting with my Ranger Distressing thingy and added Distress Inks around the edge of the silhouette circle.
And wondering, “Why me?”
“Don’t ever what me again, if you don’t want me to beat you to death” He said forcefully.
I am pure of heart, liver and anything else that collects drugs. Vitamins, Aleve and an occasional Excedrin Migraine don't count. My app addiction isn't drug influenced, it is word related. Mostly.
Back on New Year’s Day, many of you might have vowed to take your craft more seriously in 2012…before the world ends, of course. This resolution likely means more conferences and many, many more queries.
I am too young to be a spectator as well.I am full of unleashed energy,unleashed anger,unleashed desires to change at least one tiny thing.For those who are desperate at their 15 years old.For your child and my children too.
"Give us some extra time, will ya?" Grey asked. "I need to put Mase in the crib while I clean this up. Helen, clean up time."
Thank you so much everyone! A special thank you to the vendors who made another great giveaway possible and congrats to our winners!! Have fun this summer with all your new goodies!
Garbarek is the musician I have had most pleasure from watching live. His quartet with Weber, Mazur, and Bruninghaus offers little engagement with the audience, no light chat, no introductions, but is an organic machine, each member seeming to know what each other is about to do. From Garbarek I would choose
Today I caught him beautifully as he was engrossed in watching frogs instead of me.
Speaker: Christiane Groth, Director, The Corporate Executive Board IT Practice
All this was, was a waste of my time and life
Here’s to you, Prince Beauregard XXV. Happy birthday, little bro. I love you.
“I believe the IRS accepted the numbers given without examination,” Brodsky responded.
The rehearsal tonight was subdued. We did our best - we've got a gig on Friday playing Gun Club & Jeffrey Lee Pierce songs at a charity show to raise money for the homeless.
than 170 million records during
Patrick had placed the card there. I read it and thought those words were not for me. Not after what I had done. I am no ones treasure. Yet, I had no desire to leave my life of sin. I just thought that was who I had become. I was an adulteress.
4) Game of the night is in Chicago on the southside as Mr. Perfect Philip Humber faces the Red Sox
I know there are millions of people out there who choose to use and abuse substances over living their lives, and for many years, I thought they had the right idea. I in no way condone drug use, I have been down that road and I can tell you endless stories about the stupidity and bad decisions involved in drug abuse. I have driven friends away, watched people die, and nearly killed myself in an endless quest for what? A better high? I hope for a chance to share some of my stories and memories in a format easily accessible to other people with a past.
So I can't wait for this week to start!! Well, I can considering I'm still on Spring Break - But I'm excited because we're starting mean, median, mode, and range. The kids really like this because part of it involves working with a calculator! So for a fun center I thought we'd incorporate Easter - even though Easter will be over by Monday. But oh well! It will still be fun. Here's what I'm thinking...
Please can you email us at TOMICblog@gmail.com, placing 'Guest DT Spot' as the Subject and we can send your your Guest DT badge and the theme of the future challenge. If you are unable to join us please let us know and we will then pick another guest.
As Kevin left the Pre-Op room, I was wheeled down to the Operating Room. Once I got in the Operating Room, I was surprised to see such a large team of doctors and nurses. There were 8 people in the room when I got in there. The Anesthesiologist came in and told me he was ready to put me to sleep. The next thing I remember is the nurse holding the oxygen over my face and telling me to take deep breaths. That’s when I fell asleep.
'Whitley had more of that "I play polo and go yachting on the weekends" look.'
Add veggies to pan. (Make sure to cut so finely that they will cook in a couple of minutes.)
An Interview for The Zombie Bookshelf -
So that was my experience with Victorian Disco Cosmetics. I hope you all understand that I'm not out for blood and I'm not trying to trash the company. I'm not nitpicking or trying to find fault, I just had really bizarre reactions to these products, and I feel like you guys deserve to know what happened. Ashley has been great at taking my feedback on board, and that's the reason why this isn't a 'Don't shop at Victorian Disco Cosmetics' post. While Ashley's shadows fell short of my expectations, her customer service exceeded them. I would be willing to give the newly formulated shadows a second chance, and I would be willing to shop there as a paying customer.
They are attached to sensors that measure their heartbeat and other vital signs. Three breathe clean air, the other three diluted air coming from the plant's chimney.
Dahlia Seed - Cradle Split 7" Rare UK Release Limited 1000 ... Snowblind Records 1996
However, there are some aspects and methods of editing that are more enjoyable (or at least less boring) than others. Let’s quickly go over some of the more conventional editing methods:
David, a man known for his great love of God and inspired leadership of Israel, was also deeply flawed. Usually the incident with Bathsheba and Uriah is the prime example of David’s sin, but maybe another area should come more often to the fore. David repented of his sin against Bathsheba and Uriah, but he kept Joab in the inner circle of his trust throughout his kingship, despite the latter’s repeated unethical behavior. Perhaps the treachery of Joab was in fact the treachery of David.
Generally, the game stopped being fun after the drama started. For those who haven't played this game much or are looking to, note that the game is a LOT of fun! It's the staff that sadly ruins it. Maybe in the future if a host/staff change happens, the game will be more fun.
Men can't control their unconscious (by definition) any more than we can (most of us) decide what we want to dream about when we sleep. If a man can make peace with his anima, either through art, meditation, astral voyaging, lucid dreaming, good deeds, or just accumulated wisdom, he is en route to becoming a 'whole' soul. The anima steps out of the shadows of the unconscious, halfway, and he steps into it, halfway, and they are married in the Jungian reunification alchemical ritual. But he will never understand her, never know her except in what she wants to reveal.
I haven’t grabbed too many freebies lately because as time goes on things rarely catch my eye or it’s stuff I already have. Although I still have a soft spot for sexy and quirky things so I picked up this fishnet dress from The Black Widow Hunt at Kastle Rock Couture. I kinda went nuts with the styling and colorful tattoos to match the hunt gift from Evie’s Closet. Oh whoops…
We are blessed to be in good health….
1 green pepper, chopped
The notes usually contain activities such as:
I wrote back "Were out. See you at the house later."
I will be truly happy once this is all done!
At the intersection of Broadway & 7th Avenues between 46th & 47th Streets, hundreds of yogis will sun salute in honor of the solstice (and all the wonderful benefits of yoga, or whatever their personal intention may be). There are several classes offered, but you have to pre-register, and teachers from NYC studios (including my own, Reflections Yoga) will be offering the solstice classes.
We've all heard of "branding" and "platform." I confess these are words I can't really get my head around. What do they mean? Are they words coined by some ad exec? Don Draper, perhaps? According to Nathan Bransford, there is no such thing as a brand.
As it turned out, the owner of the ship, who insisted on making the trip, suffered the most loss. The ship with all its cargo was a total loss according to verse 41. Through it all, no lives were lost however. Isn’t it ironic that the world, thinking it has all the answers, is headed for destruction?
1.) I feel like the past few months bloggers have really lost touch with why most of us blog. People are beginning to tear others down with rude and judgemental comments. Luckily I haven't experienced this but a couple of times and it's just responses I see on twitter shortly after I link a post up. It hurts but not as bad as what it could.
Tighter control from Berlin will not work for the likes of France, Spain and Italy. I doubt very much if it would be acceptable to the Irish either. Further, tighter control will only produce smarter ClubMed ways of avoiding the rules. The Latin culture prefers to evade laws it doesn’t like – especially if they emanate from people with a history of invading them.
From the Blog:
Shaftesbury’s Theory of Art: Substance and Identity
I sat there in shock by what he had done. All the while wondering what was filtering through my mother's mind. What would she think? Would she ask him to leave? Did she think I had made a huge mistake by already falling head over heels for this man? I dropped my head in defeat. If he didn't win my Mom over, he didn't stand a chance. I just sat there waiting for what seemed an eternity. Bracing for what lay ahead.
Last week was Staff Appreciation Week at school.. I just ADORE the school and am gonna miss EVERYONE so much when Amanda heads to Middle School next year.. I wanted to send in something for everyone on our list that went home! So that is what we did!! (warning LOTS of photos ahead!)
We sat in the classroom, all silent. One of them stood in front of the chalk board, she too was dressed in black with something white around the top of her head. Some kind of hat. Right below her head was a large white disc that looked like it was sawed in two. She held a long wooden yardstick in her wrinkled old hand. She just stood there glaring at us. I could make out her bee bee eyes behind her glasses, they were dark blue. She started to speak, “Now who can tell me about Jesus......And then it happened like it always did. There she was standing in front of the class. She had to be the most beautiful teacher at 179. Miss Saltzman, with beautiful dark eyes and long silky black hair. She had to be a dream, because when she spoke to me I just melted. When I’m old enough I’m going to marry Miss Saltzman, my third grade teacher. And even when she handed me my test papers that usually scored no more than 65. I just stared at her beautiful milky white hands and then her beautiful face, then down her neck to her tight pink sweater and then at her two beautiful full......Wack!, Wack!, Wack!, the tip of the wooden yardstick slammed hard on my desk, just barely missing my little fingers and almost hitting my Timex Dumbo watch that my Mom just bought me for Christmas. “I said wake-up and pay attention young man!” “Don’t you care about Jesus?”
Once upon a time, a girl named Riley went to pick up a movie (Gallipoli) to watch for extra credit in European history. She happened to be wearing one of her favorite shirts, a stylin' Fahrenheit 451 from OutofPrint.
Brave sons of liberty, fallen in battle,
These days, most recipes seem to specify “softened butter”, except of course where you rub the butter in or melt it. Now there’s a challenge. I have tried putting the butter on top of the radiator, microwaving it, or just leaving it out of the fridge for a while, all with variable success. Then I read somewhere recently that the best way is to grate the butter straight from the fridge and that softens it. This seemed like a lot of faff but actually it only took a few moments and worked a treat. I will do that every time from now on, as I prefer to use real butter rather than the spreadable stuff from a tub.
The story takes place in a city humming with life over the course of a long night as Eri sits out the hours in a Denny’s and is pulled unexpectedly into events outside of her typical lifestyle. As Eri encounters a world of prostitution and “love-ho’s” (hotels for couples meeting to make love) her sister Mari slumbers deep and sound in her room at home, a beautiful Sleeping Beauty who is unaware of the strange things happening around her in her bedroom.
While the custard is heating, chill a metal mixing bowl in the freezer, and have a larger mixing bowl into which the chilled one will fit when the larger bowl is filled with ice. Then you're going to replicate the environment of an old-fashioned cranked ice cream maker by placing ice cubes and salt in the larger bowl, and stirring the custard in the smaller bowl set over the ice until it has chilled. You must be careful, however, as the ice melts, that you do not inadvertently get salty ice water into the custard.
3 O gato e o canário
This post is picture heavy but I am so thrilled to share that I couldn't hold back! I am not a wedding decorator but I'm passionate about the design of anything and this was a unique challenge for me. I really enjoyed it! It was such an amazing experience to be part of such a great group and to put this all together on a cold (freezing) winter day. I'd say it was worth it!
10am to 5pm
So was finagling getting internet service moved. Fun.
And it’s dangerously close to becoming the law of the land.
During the entire lifetime of the troublemaker and warrior, Mokopane, his tribe was in continual warfare with the Sebitiela tribe. This tribe was not strong enough to defeat Mokopane and they often called for assistance from the baPedi, who launched at least three failed attacks on Mokopane. Every time Mokopane and his tribe were attacked they would flee to a large cave in a rock ledge on one side of a ravine. The cave is located some distance off the R101, 19 km northeast of Potgietersrus (Mokopane). According to measurements made by the Boers back then, the cave was about 2000 feet long, and 500 – 700 feet broad. Defensive walls, house-like structures, live-stock pens, pathways and fences were built within this enormous cave. Significant amounts of food and water were also stored in advance.
Alabama/Sweet Home Alabama
Here's the not so good news: there's going to have to be a price increase...
And for that matter. I’m proud of me. For all those who have helped me through (my blog readers included). For making it this far.
According to the Department of Natural Resources of Wisconsin, Approximately 100 billion plastic bags are used in the United States every year. The issues with all these plastic grocery bags, is they end up in the ocean and are digested by all sorts of animals. Of course this is not a natural source of food or these animals, which has caused harm.
Look, people are interested in sex, I’m interested in sex. Someone once told me that all of my sex scenes were old fashioned and I said, well sex is an old fashioned activity! Adam and Eve were at it like rabbits! It’s a part of life and I think every story should have relationships in them.
Flip the whole thing over so that you aren't ironing directly on your ribbon.
ABOUT MUSCLE CAR 1000
BE SPECIFIC about what choices Randi makes and what's at stake. Without that it's just noise.
“I am the commander of the third air wing,” General Watanabe continued. “My orders are to support you in your mission any way possible.”
I did promise to blog about my opinion on The Hunger Games Movie today. It has been a busy and long day. I am hoping after dinner I will get sometime with my laptop to blog. So hopefully another blog post coming soon :)
We also have a small preview for Sailing the Starlit Sea in the pipeline. This one will touch on runic organelles. I want to answer some questions I have been asked or have seen in other places. This article will discuss what sources inspired me, the purpose of these little critters, and their origin within the StSS setting.
5th Course:
A 60-year-old New York City man is so sure the world will end on May 21, he has spent his retirement savings to warn people about it.
“Because Africa seems unfinished and so different from the rest of the world, a landscape on which a person can sketch a new personality, it attracts mythomaniacs, people who wish to convince the world of their worth.”
While the eggs are cooking, spoon the tomato sauce over the tortillas then sprinkle with some coriander and the grated cheese. Top with the egg then sprinkle over some salt and a little extra coriander. Eat at once while hot and delicious with a good cup of coffee to really
1 display
But I have offered to help a friend sew some pin-wheels for a special project...yes I did!! Pin-wheels!!
At number 37 Rue de la Victoire, a teal-blue refurbished cruise liner sits waiting for passengers and a chance to set sail again. Created in 1958 by the architects Jean Balladur and Benjamin Lebeigle, this lightweight, elegantly curved creation was a revolution when it arrived in the city. This was the first entirely moduble building in Paris with no internal structural posts. Built around a steel skeleton, with a flexible skin of glass and steel stretched across the frame, it was nevertheless inside that the difference could truly be appreciated. The Caisse Centrale de Réassurance, who moved into the structure, were able to appropriate the space as they wished, throwing up temporary non-supporting dividing walls wherever they were needed.
"It begins with L; It's brown,
The mad Orwellian creed of multiculturalism, which our rulers have imposed upon us has produced a reality where, when addressing the subject of race and religion the only act left to us, which is legal and permissible, is to lie.
Call me suspicious, but I sense a dimension of sympathy vote in this ‘she-was-hacked-too’ mullarkey. Fine, I know the Met found her name in all the Mulcaire stuff, but…well, this is the Met we’re talking about here. And Roop – who has a bit of a thing for Big Hair Becky – is very keen for her to get off.
Don't worry, I'm not about to bad-mouth sippy cups, you'll see the correlation in a paragraph or so. I feel like Satan has been attacking our family since the second we picked up our foster daughter a couple weeks ago. Since her first night here, I have had a child vomiting, sneezing snot everywhere or lethargic with a fever every single day. I came down with strep throat a couple days ago and Seth broke his toe yesterday. Really?! In all honesty, I have been dealing with everything fairly well. We've been living off of frozen meals I'd stashed away and homemade chicken soup. There was one incident when I threw a sippy cup at the wall because I couldn't get the lid off because my joints were aching so badly from my fever. Shortly thereafter I realized that was exactly what Satan wanted and by giving into frustration, I was letting him steal my joy and peace that the Lord has blessed us with.
I promise to try more for my family. To not get too upset when I decided to just "prepare" dinner instead of making dinner. I won't put too much pressure on myself.
"Venus de Milo was a neurasthenic, her stomach was out of place and she wasn't half as healthy or happy as the modern flapper." Dr. Thomas R. Thorborn, New York diagnostician.
Acts 5:1-10 – The Apostle Peter DISCERN Ananias and Sapphira Lies.
What the law says
these streets,
Throw you far
While topping up my DTH account the other day I found myself asking “Is the money i pay for cable tv really worth it?”. The main reason was that i realized that my TV viewing is almost 80% sports, 15% movies and 5% news with no room for anything else. In fact, if tomorrow every single channel apart from ESPN-Star, Ten Sports, Neo Sports, NDTV and CNN-IBN went out of business it wouldn’t effect my TV watching habit in the least (you can add Times Now to that list just for the sheer entertainment of watching Arnab Goswami go crazy on live tv). This led to the following thoughts about the state of current programming on TV.
I love everything French, who wouldn't?
He who perceives himself the underdog or the oppressed, responds by emotion and often by anger which, in his view, is "warranted". He who controls and manipulates those emotions and anger can control the situation, the person, a nation and perhaps even the World. Hitler was a case in point, South Africa is a typical example of the above.
Games: 3D Bounce and Global Race
Picture Format: Widescreen
We’re also pleased to announce the confirmed involvement of North of Watford’s SARAH EMMOTT and there will be more confirmed connections soon enough!
UPDATE: 11:55 p.m. Nov. 10
Mitt Romney’s response : ‘If anyone was hurt by that or offended by that, obviously I apologize. But overall, high school years were a long time ago.”
Evalina
I did not add a sentiment. I have needed a card a couple of times lately and everything I have laying around had a sentiment that was not for the occasion I needed. I like to be able to add them as needed. If I make them up ahead of time they all end up being "Birthday" or "Thank You" cards. :)
1) A magic lamp 2) My beautiful wife 3) Unlimited source of food and water.
Heard some wild geese go right over the house this morning. Nothing quite beats wild geese singing in the gray morning.
-A plot of land = one area of grass
Confused, he asked what I meant. Of course, how else would I respond but so graciously and flattering as he had?
Day 2
I walk into the water,
On top of the two boxes of pizzas that were picked up to bring back for dinner, was a bag of piping hot Bread Bites. The aroma of fresh baked bread and its seasoning quickly filled the vehicle, causing my taste buds and my tummy to turn summersaults in anticipation! Not to be unfair to the others, I only snitched one of the Bites from the tempting bag, savoring every morsel of garlic and speck of parmesan. That meal was over two weeks ago and I still think about those Bites … but for more reasons than their taste.
Next up, F.A.O. Schwartz where E reveled in the dollhouse section and both girls ran and slid on the Big Piano before we watched the final Big Piano performance of the day and closed the place. We walked back down Broadway where we picked up mediocre dinner at a cafe (but enjoyed my first canoli), were amazed by the lights and INCREASED crowds of late evening, and found our way to another large toy store which clearly hopes to compete with Schwartz, but which also lacked class (and offered MUCH flimsier toys) not to mention countless toy firearms, of which I'm not a fan.
Thanks for visiting!!! Don't forget to leave your comments and don't forget to check out the Shabby Apple giveaway! You will feel AMAZING in this dress if you win!!! Somebody's gotta win, so why can't it be YOU?
red chilly powder 1 tbsp
Accessories do not have to be Danielle, only the dress. Please, use the sparkling version of the dress for pictures.
Wednesday, April 18th and Thursday, April 19th: Texas Library Association Annual Conference, Houston, TX; various times
To this day, the cats we call tortoiseshell are the descendants of that black cat that long ago hosted the sun during its visit to Earth. Today we can still see hints of the sun in the patches of red, yellow and orange that cover their coats. The split face on some of these cats is further evidence of their dual nature; half cat, half heavenly star.
Given that the entire election turned into a sectarian, “I’m more Muslim than you” contest, between Hussein and Galloway, not surprisingly the 50% of the constituency that are thought to actually be English stayed at home. Thus the turnout crucially was exactly 50%.
If you don't like that metal Florida keychain, give it to your nephew. That Bali T-shirt that is too big for you? Give it to your strapping younger brother. If he doesn't like it, he can still wear it to sleep in, which is much better than let it being unused at all! What about that tissue pouch from Hongkong? Give it to the maid who's never been to Hongkong. You might think it's rude to re-gift those to others, but I personally think it's even more rude to just let them sitting there, unopened, unused, unappreciated, months after months after months.
“Everything was happening without my participation. My fate was being decided without anyone so much as asking my opinion.”
My feather charm. The belt was one of the items we thrifted for our steampunk costumes - it's leather and the silver pieces are really heavy. It was $1.00 in the children's section (I don't think it's a kids' belt, though).
Summer Bicknell did not open her ice-pop business on a whim. In 2004, she traveled 2,000 miles to Tlazazalca, Mexico, for an intensive, three-month paleta-making apprenticeship. She hasn’t stopped moving since. In 2005, Bicknell opened the first Locopops in a tiny space near the Duke campus and has since expanded to Chapel Hill and Raleigh. Her flavors cover plenty of ground, too — crowd-pleasers like chocolate brownie share the stage with wilder styles that incorporate black truffle, olive oil and even bacon. 1908 Hillsborough St., locopops.org.
I went for a walk yesterday morning to a nearby city park surrounding a lake. Much of it remains wild, with many native plants and animals. Mostly, it’s an excellent place to observe the migratory birds over the course of a year(s). The walk lightened my heart and outlook as I crossed the bridge that travels through the willow tops soft green with new leaves and over a marsh. On the second bridge, which sets a good 12 feet over the second marsh, I observed and heard red-winged blackbirds calling in their vibrato sing-song. A path, then, skirts both the back pond as well as the main lake on which floated mallards, pie-billed grebes, and coots. A coot happily labored amongst the lilies looking for just the right stalk to paddle back to its nest with. The opposite side of the pond created a backdrop for the blue heron standing tall and still over its nest. Finally, as I stood to see if any turtles might appear on a distant log, a healthy gray squirrel skittered up and beseeched me for a little nibble.
Sooo I was heading back to the car when all of a sudden I lost my footing and fell on my right knee and somehow twisted my left ankle. I got up right away and my right knee had a pretty bad scrape. This is the 3rd time that I scrape the same knee. As I walked to the car I felt ok. My right knee was in pain mainly because I had just scraped it on hard pavement. My left leg was feeling fine as well.
Three Things I have learned this week:
I wanted something fairly seasonal but not overly traditional and screaming of Christmas so thought blue was a good choice. I love the music script on the darker paper and the snowflakes on the panels!! The image I thought fitted the bill perfectly, even for the time of year!!
This room (in the Kauai building) faced the interior gardens. We couldn’t see the pool at all, but it was a much, much better location with view of the gardens. We were on the first floor with two taro ponds in front of us. Lovely and tropical. In reviewing their hotel web site (back home), room 169 was actually an Aloha Value room (lowest category), which faces “exterior lawns or surrounding hotels.” We should have received the garden view room (160 is not a pool view room) in the first place, which is what I booked. A letter to Ms. Kristelle and Ms. Dora (reservations manager) will be sent to them.
Mix all ingredients together in one bowl. Put in greased muffin tin. Bake at 325 degrees for approx. 45 minutes or until toothpick comes out clean.
I'm facing this situation myself at the moment. I spent all last year querying a sci-fi with romantic elements, Atrophy. I got some great rejections, agents who said "I can't take this because it falls right between sci-fi and romance, so don't know what to do with it, but write something else and send me that!"
Faster Monkey Games
You were all cunning: “Can’t we just work this out? Don’t you want to wait until you build up your next divided allotment?” Yeah, I know what that means: delay this indefinitely until we can get back ahold of you! Well, sir, I’m happy to give you my $43.99. Because, like I mentioned, it’s not my money anyway. Why don’t you give it back to that grandma on line 2 that you’re trying to guilt trip into payments she can’t afford?
Accessories: Craft felt, twine from The Twinery, Lifestyle Crafts/Quickutz embossing folder, Spellbinder's die, Fiskars tag punch, red brad
But Gisli smote back at him with his battle-axe, and took off the tail of his shield, and Skeggi’s leg along with it; and as he smote he chaunted:
As one of the first 20 though the door we got a free t-shirt which even better included a woman's fit option. Rather nice touch, I have numberous t-shirts in trible xl that I can't wear other than as a dress, this one I can wear! :) The whole organisation of the day was smooth, tables with water jugs, friendly staff and live music. It was one of the best laid back events I have gone too.
AKRF's tab neared $5 million as of May 2007 and surely bumped up another 20-30% or so in 2009 and 2010, when it was commissioned by the Empire State Development Corporation to issue new sets of documents associated with the re-approval of Atlantic Yards and the court case challenging the environmental review.
“South Geysers” has failed
On Wednesday, June 28, 2008, I wrote Insult to Injury. I had found what was to me one of the worst insults in the New York City dining experience - I enumerated 7 points outlining the transgressions.
It feels a little off topic to update music here since this blog was designed for life and hand crafting but music is a big part of my life, I’ve sort of abandoned my music blog and wow, I have a fun gig coming up. If you are reading this from the Albany area, I hope you can join us for this special annual event.
Jerry asks, "What is wrong with you, Tom?"
The company, backed by several billionaires, is working to recruit engineering and mission-planning expertise and allow private companies to bid to help it launch the spacecraft, said John S. Lewis, a University of Arizona planetary-science professor who said he is an adviser to Planetary.
When I say "Theme Park" I do not mean Disneyland (though there's plenty right with Disneyland) but something more like Archeon, the wondeful Dutch Historical Theme Park near Amsterdam. They have three periods: Prehistorical, Medieval and Roman, and all three are brilliantly reproduced. They aren't just fronts, but buildings you can walk into and look around, e.g. the baths, an arena for gladiatorial combat and a roman style villa. For Pompeii we could replicate one of the most famous streets, the Via dell'Abbondanza, with election graffiti, frescoes, shop signs, and upper stories as well as ground floors. Fountains would bubble and some could overflow, showing tourists why the famous stepping stones existed in such a dry climate!
I wasn’t too keen for more expenses, more phoning/emailing/organising, finding a venue, stressing… All the rest. So I figured we should do something totally the opposite of our Jo’burg engagement party. We’d go totally Durban.
How do you incorporate the kind of speech your characters use without becoming incomprehensible to your readers?
Oh, this child
5 likewise
Through the hollow caverns of my sleeping
Lets try this another way. If you're calling about payments, say "payments".
Hey guys so I need another valentine look for you to get Addicted to Passion and Romance. This is just using romance on the lid and passion on the eye. Really simple quick and easy look really soft but still using color with some nude pinky lips so guys I hope you enjoy this tutorial so if you have questions you are free to ask and let’s get started.
Tucker’s first double entendre song was the old whorehouse number “There’s Company in the Parlor, Girls, Come On Down.” As Tucker herself observed, there’s precious few girl singers who can get a double entendre song over. Any conventionally beautiful woman just seems like a tramp if she sings a bawdy song—at least that was the conventional wisdom of her time. In the wake of Madonna, of course, tramps are de rigeur. In Tucker’s day though, when, a fairly good looking woman (like Mae West) sang a sexy number she became a pariah. A fat woman (Tucker topped out at 192 lbs) was not threatening, so Sophie’s sexy songs were written off as humor. Such numbers were to become a staple of her repertoire.
2. Prepare vinaigrette by combining rice vinegar, sugar, rice wine, light soy sauce, dark soy sauce and fish sauce. Set aside.
imagine the outside
Safe Routes to School National Course in Maryland
Well. 3 computer crashes and about 2 weeks late, I finally managed to finish Candyman. It definitely wasn't as good as I remembered it, but the unintentional laughs were worth it. I don't remember if there were 3 movies in the franchise or 4, but I'm pretty sure they don't get better after this one, so it'll be entertaining to make fun of those as well. I'll give Candyman an average 3 killer trees out of 5.
In his short career he has wrestled in six countries total including Austria Canada, England, Germany ,Japan and of course throughout the United States.
On one hand, I kind of have this overwhelming urge to "prove" to every anti-unschooling person that unschoolers can succeed in college. (Look at my 4.04 cumulative GPA. Yeah, 4.04. See that? Is your product of public school achieving that?)
Theresa Russell (Whore)
In an alley just off the main shopping centre is a reminder of the Second World War. As in London, painted directions guided people to public air raid shelters. Here, the 'ARP shelter for 367 persons' was in cellars under several local shops. Today the sign is unnoticed - I wouldn't have found it had I not happened across it on Hidden Teesside.
Which is why when last night's Steelers/Ravens re-match aired on Sunday night, AT Heinz Field in Pittsburgh, I was terrified to watch the thing. The Ravens had not been playing great, their O-Line was a mess, and Flacco was not the Quarterback that he was on Opening Day.
8) All colleges are either Harvard, Princeton, MIT, or imaginary.
Start by asking God for the names of six people in your area who need a meaningful relationship with Christ.
Partner #2:
Finally we have our promotional strategy. A large focus for our product will be on forming a lasting buyer-seller relationship. Due to the group-thinking focus of the Spanish, the acceptance of the product within an individual’s family is first priority. If the buyer’s family and friends approve of the product, they will likely choose to buy it themselves, which is an essential sales-driver. Aside from this word-of-mouth though, we will employ traditional advertising as well. The Spanish watch a lot of television, and it will therefore be our primary media. Since soccer, or football as it is called in Spain, is oft regarded as their “unofficial religion”, our commercials would likely incorporate a soccer theme to them. This creates a relationship between our product and cultural traditions, allowing the population to easily relate and feel connected. Equally important though, is the language and words we choose to convey our message. The Spanish communication style is very implicit, relying on high-context language. Our advertisements will not include features of the product and will not attempt to claim that it is superior or better than its competitors. Instead the advertising will contain very little verbal communication, relying more of the implied meaning of the messages and the commercial itself as a whole. The advertising would need to be simple and elegant, relating more to the feminine culture of Spain.
As you might imagine, we are dismayed by this discovery, and are conducting exhaustive investigations in an effort to pinpoint the problem. At this point we know enough to confirm that it was limited to three batches of Chocolate Ale bottles – it did not extend to other Chocolate Ale bottles, to Chocolate Ale draft beer, or to any other Boulevard beers. We can also confirm that the batches in question are not harmful to consume, but may simply display an undesirable flavor.
- He has included his paintings in videos with musicians and poets around the world.
Encourage, means I’m helping, there by his side, saying stuff like “way to go,” and “good job.” (Secretly, I’m praying for him and his family, but it’s a public school, so don’t tell anyone, as I’m sure it’s illegal.)
TODAY’S THOUGHT
I didn’t move. I wanted to stay planted at the goat’s milk display. There was something too pushy in her pitch and it turned me off instinctually. I didn’t want any part of it. But, Joe stepped right up.
While I'm not here to promote drinking, the bottom line is, during the Super Bowl, there will be a lot of beer being consumed. While beer is never good for your pets, a company as come up with a pet safe beer.
Lucky loves old cars. No kiddin’. Have you ever heard of the Russo-Balt K? You know nuthin’ ‘bout it? Leave it to Lucky to know. Russian, no sheet. 1913, 1914, some year like that. 4 cylinder, 24 horse power. Convertible two-seater, imagine that. Russko-Baltskij vagonnyi, Riga.
As the world begins to crumble
I try not to think deep thoughts early in the morning. Generally, just finding shoes that match can totally make me happy. But every once in a while I find myself reflecting on life in general and how it can change seemingly in an instant. Every day I struggle with paying attention to the here and now. Lofty ambitions and long-term plans have their place, but there’s also something invaluable in the simplest pastimes: a long walk in the evening; organizing that junk drawer; playing catch with the grandchildren; baking a batch of cookies.
The painting above is looking across Silver Lake towards the Ocracoke lighthouse. Silver lake is a beautiful small harbor which is surrounded by the town of Ocracoke. I was intrigued by the rustic old waterfront building and dock which rests below the view of the lighthouse. I wonder how long the old building will be there. Even though many of the old structures still remain, I am sure that money and shiny new buildings will win the battle in the end. It seems to most always end up that way. But for now Ocracoke is still a small piece of paradise to me, a breathing space in a insanely busy world. I hope it stays that way for my grandchildren to see.
Despite the projected 85 degree heat today, the tell tail signs of fall are starting to creep in, and I couldn’t be more excited. I await fall with the same anticipation as toddlers await Christmas morning. I unabashedly adore everything about Fall.
The failure of austerity policies in the above context means this: to try and approach living within a nation’s means. Snip.
Told you!
Student: Kira meja!!
Silver: Coolship Resurgam, Allagash Brewing Co., Portland, ME
Oh yeah and while you’re here did you see the post on how to reach the gold cap on WoW Insider this morning? I was so depressed, I am such an underachiever. I think, well, I know the most gold I ever had was 150,000 and once I hit that mark I immediately proceeded to spend 20,000 on just stuff.
First, it is worth noting that a product development project has been announced which could change the game with regard to touchscreen training for blind users. The National Braille Press (NBP) Center for Braille Innovation and the National Federation of the Blind (NFB) are cooperating in the development of a notetaker or personal data assistant with a braille display which will run on the Android operating system. The new product was initially called the “The Braille Wizard.” Unhappily, “Wizard” as a name was already copyrighted, so NBP is conducting a contest in search of a new name. Although the device isn’t likely to be ready for delivery before 2012, the new Android-based product may very well be the next new notetaker in our field, as other developers look to see what its affects will be on the market and how close it will come to its unofficial price estimate of $2,000. If this new product becomes the next big thing whenever it might be released, touchscreen training for blind users will quickly become as common as books on Windows and Microsoft Word are today. For now, however, early adopters of Apple and Android products may be the best available source of information on those touchscreens which have begun to learn to talk.
Bearing in mind that one of them is a dying man wrongly convicted of mass murder and the other is a respected Scottish politician and upstanding member of the legal profession which secured his conviction, I know who I believe!
And here is where the sofa and table are. Never mind the house shoes, toy bins, and Nascar racers on the floor... If I think of them as accessories lovingly added by my family, they don't bother me as badly!
Be true to your word. If you say it, mean it.
The Local Taphouse is to be commended for not only creating an environment where beer can be truly appreciated but which also refuses to rest on its laurels. If anyone had dare suggest even a few years ago that forty people would pay forty bucks each to go to a little pub in an out-of-the-way location to drink beers mixed and blended with other beers for them by a dodgy (in a very nice way) unintelligible Scotsman you would have been laughed straight back to the asylum.
Lunch: 1 bowl of oats bisibelabath with one appadam on side
PS: I recall seeing several of you mentioning that today is your birthday, too! Leave your link below so I can wish you a proper happy birthday! Woohoo Aries! ;)
Holy crap. Been since October since I posted? I know y'all have all been sitting around wondering "OMG, where is BOTD?" Well, y'all can all just relax now.
As a result of the tormenting, she said she suffered a nervous breakdown, severe depression and migraines.
Also, I have two winners to announce for the Getting Cricky Show Your Style Blog Hop and My-O's 32 Birthday Blog Hop and I will do that tomorrow!! :)
Patsy Cline (September 8, 1932 – March 5, 1963), born Virginia Patterson Hensley, was an American country music singer who enjoyed pop music crossover success during the era of the Nashville sound in the early 1960s. Since her death at age 30 in a 1963 private airplane crash at the height of her career, she has been considered one of the most influential, successful and acclaimed female vocalists of the 20th century.
☆ Day five: 5 of your favourite places to buy your clothes.
The story doesn’t indicate what the messages translate to, but I’m sure it’s not “Eat at Joe’s” or “Goodyear.”
Some of it, I believe. I just am perplexed as to how a woman could sleep with so many men and be so open about it. Or even as to how she could have slept with so many men.... Why have none of these guys come out of the woodworks about her stories??
The love that’s been
all the way to your
I know the Holy Spirit is steadfast within us, but sometimes as believers we can ignore that very adhesiveness that binds the being within us. We ignore Him and go our own way.
An airstrike Sunday killed a top al-Qaida leader on the FBI's most wanted list for his role in the 2000 bombing of the USS Cole warship, Yemeni officials said. The drone attack was carried out by the CIA, U.S. officials said.
I feel especially concerned about this trend among pastors, elders, and those who would do counseling work. I hate to say it, but the Bible doesn’t specifially address many of the particular disorders, afflictions, and struggles that people experience today. PTSD…Biploar…depression…OCD…these are not gospel centered issues and a gospel centered solution is just…illusory.
That's it for the tutorial! Hope you like it and have fun with it! ^______^ Let's all be pretty from head to toe together!
I want to see her grow healthily and wealthily.
Facebook is the cream of the crop for drawing visibility on the web today. Meet new people and tell them about the useful resources you have that can empower them for the better rather its products or services adding friends and solving problems comes in one big lump sum. I suggest you do not push websites on people you’ve just met on Facebook instead become more acquainted with these individuals and sooner or later they are going to trust you more. Stay in focused groups that focuses on certain matters. Post messages that are not spam or build a brand for future endurance for your website. Add the “LIKE” button on the website so when members of Facebook visits they can press it if there interest in the post is highly anticipated. Either way the traffic is going to com by staying consistent.
Since you are most likely to keep a regular job while undertaking an online PhD degree, you will have to choose a schedule that will fit your day job and will allow you to take lessons conveniently. You will then be able to concentrate on the activities on hand and prepare for your lessons appropriately without interfering with your normal work hours.
JA: Being part of a minority, I learned to be open-minded. Laughing a lot as it was in my family gives me strength. Both my parents had jobs they did not like and made economic choices for their lives. They were frustrated although they would never lose their joy. So I decided that my professional choices would be what I really want to do, nothing else.
years prior).
Potential Insights: Is it a once in a lifetime adventure or can it become a continuous challenge with positively increasing influence on a variety of people.
Format: LP
He looked tired, bwoii.
And here we do get to the problem with this redemptive reading of Season 22 - one I copped to when introducing the approach. It’s still based on the fact that the stories of Season 22 are almost all pretty bad. There are flashes of quality, and even, with Vengeance on Varos, a sustained attempt at it, but they feel like moments of lucidity in the midst of a protracted decline.
2. The Eyes Of Love
So that’s the first feature on my checklist of what the ultimate MMO needs to have. Have you played any of the CoH user generated content? Do you think this is the future for MMOs? Let us know.
I stretched my legs out in front of me. Man, it feels so good not being cramped all of the time.
I recently read Peter Bregman’s book ‘18 minutes: Find Your Focus, Master Distraction, and Get the Right Things Done’, and I must say this was one of the better time management books I have read. I really enjoyed Peter’s analogy of likening our time management challenge to a buffet. I have trouble with buffets. I have a tendency to want to try everything and even if I only take a little of everything that is often still way too much. Peter suggests we often manage our time like that – because there is so much to do, so many interesting people, enjoyable activities, worthwhile causes and compelling opportunities, it’s hard to choose. So we don’t. We try to do it all. Peter offers some really good solutions, ones that are do-able, all in 18 minutes a day.
OK... so I really wanted to document this whole process with photos, but there were a couple factors involved in my failure to do that. 1) I was a nervous WRECK because I was, with the help of some friends and the cooperation of the entire cross-country/distance track team, planning and trying desperately to pull off a surprise party for Anders, so I was really busy, and 2) I'm out of practice so I just... forgot. See, I finally found this amazing recipe for a classic vanilla, yellow cake, which I used, and I wanted so badly to share it with everyone. And I will! My birthday is two weeks from tomorrow, and I'm planning on making cupcakes with this recipe for my classes (because I'm 22 going on 7 apparently), so I will post it then! I promise!
back there ever since".
So, I want to say to all those parents of younger kids, that you really, truly, don't need to worry about reading and writing. Read to your kids, enjoy reading yourself, and the rest will come! Your kids may or may not develop a passion for language, as that depends in large part on personality, as well, but I can't help but feel that they're so much more likely to come to love words, love the beauty of language, if they approach it in freedom!
and sink brave men in the salty sea
Install Squid3.
1) Thought
...That's the question I hear at least 2 times a week. Usually when I'm out and about, trying to shop...
This is probably a good place to stop for today.
The incident became public on April 12 when one of the prostitutes argued with a Secret Service agent over her payment in a hallway of the Caribe Hotel.
Love, know love
Now she has a little matching 'set'.
But narrow definition of party aside, I think confetti (or funfetti, or rainbow bit) cupcakes are the partiest of the party cupcakes, and the weather was so awesome in Vancouver this week it was time to celebrate.
Louboutin’s designs are indeed too sexy to have to serve a function or be practical but what about contemporary architectural designs, which must almost dogmatically follow function, can they ever be sexy? Can the design term “sexy”, which is so often used by architecture academics mainly to grab their audience’s attention, ever be accurately used for buildings?
Smarty-Sherlock Man Bo reports that he traced the princess’ steps and it’s possible that she was poisoned. She could have walked from his quarters to the Lotus Pond before the poison kicked in, causing her to fall into the water.
Gladys stood up straight and tall and nodded in the affirmative. She furrowed her brow and watched as each of her classmates filed from the room. She shifted the large manuscript feeling it heavy in her hand. She walked to the door stepped out, then stepped back in and switched off the lights because her daddy taught her to always turn the light off when you leave the room. Ready Kilowatt didn’t like it when you wasted electricity.
.... and then I spent the remainder of the weekend reading them cover to cover and sticky-noting everything!!
Actually, I'm pretty proud of that unique number. That means I tried a different beer almost every day! In general, I strive for culinarily adventurousness, and almost never drink the same beer consecutively.
“War is hell, Kayla. It was never meant to be something glorious and pretty. Sometimes, the good of many do outweigh the needs of the one. So does it matter if in order to save the day at some future point that we have to play the role of the villain?”
In case Visitor Event is coming back, if you don’t remember it or never saw it, it will most likely be the same as it was before this year so just look here.
Style: Fruit Beer (India Pale Ale)
Let’s delve into the random category first shall we? Lindsay Lohan arrived a day late with her signature strawberry locks, a new set of veneers and her lawyer Shawn Chapman Holly. Also on hand was Kate Upton, the infamous 2012 Sport’s Illustrated cover girl wearing a rather demure Alexander McQueen number. Kim Kardashian, reality star and future mayor of Glendale showed up in a green velvet gown with her mom/manager in tow. Supermodel Elle Macpherson had a bad case of Angelina Jolie’s right leg all night. Rosario Dawson displayed her ample “assets” in a super tight low-cut satin gown throwing any concept of what a White house appropriate wardrobe is to the wind.
at a blank notebook for an hour before I admitted
12 year old Steven Lamb doesn’t have a lot to be happy about. He, his brother Davey and their mother Lettie, live with Steven’s Nan. His mother clearly favours Davey, and his nan is haunted by the loss of her own son Billy almost two decades earlier. Billy was believed to have been a victim of serial killer Arnold Avery, who is now in prison. Billy’s body was never found, and Steven has spent a huge amount of time digging to try and find it on Exmoor (where oher victims of Avery were buried).
Joan of Arc by Diane Stanley
At this point I am uncertain what is in the washing machine, but a bill will be forthcoming for replacement clothing. I sincerely hope that the machine does not contain any irreplaceable items such as concert T’s or custom/hand-made clothing.
What can I say about "Kill Em" besides the fact that Guilty sounds more sociopathic and paranoid than ever and Lib always comes through with the sample heavy heat...
When I decided and understood I could love this child unconditionally and not ask him to be different so I could feel better, a shift began to happen within me. I made the decision to be happy no matter what I was witnessing and observing around me, including embracing the fact that my precious child was diagnosed with a disability. As I eased into more positive emotions, reaching, reaching, reaching for better feeling thoughts, Connor became more willing to be in this world we share, rather that trying to escape my raw, negative emotions/energy/vibrations I was radiating.
remember my first day of school
Dr. Finbar Horgan, International Rice Research Institute, Philippines
Build expertise in-house.
The shoes were also diffucult to get. In most pictures, she has no shoes, but I saw one photo where she had on some strappy black sandles like I'm sporting. I found these almost new Chinese Laundry shoes at the local Salvation Army. They were probably one worn once for a prom or something. I found them on a Saturday, but they weren't priced and the manager wasn't there, so I had to go back Monday and hope they were still there. Monday I have class all day until eight though, so I went back Tuesday. Miraculously, they were still there! But unpriced... I tookk them to the counter, prepared to have to rip someone one, but I guess the manager was managing the register. She gave them to me for $5. Score!
As the first day of senior year progressed, I found it amusing that we were in the first three classes together. By the end of the day, I wondered what sick-and-twisted master of the universe had done this to me? Here was the object of my desire dangled in front of me, sweet fruits tantalizingly out of my reach, and there she was in every class of the day. Since our class schedule was the same, our lunches also coincided. Fortunately, she didn't live near me, otherwise we would have ridden the same bus together.
Just 9 weeks till we get on a plane headed for the land of frozen waffles!
Then these two little vintage lovelies came into my life this past week. $16 for both....can you believe? They jumped into my arms. We're going to rewire them so they can be hardwired instead of plugged in. (Well actually my dad will probably rewire them...there's really no "we' in it. ;-)
and Bridgets "The Polks Dot Place"
Executive Housekeeping Today
Using the new Teresa Collins DP's, Penny Black stamp inked with
Crowe went on to be a successful screenwriter and Director, having done films such as “Say Anything“, “Jerry Maguire“, “Vanilla Sky“, “Almost Famous” and others.
friends or companions,
AW the Alchemist said that the Number 1 position is “he’s to lose”. Like Fabianski before him, he has fought hard to win his place. I don’t see him relinquishing it anytime soon.
WD40
Merpel adds: there's a lively IP law culture up in Liverpool, but it needs to be properly nurtured if it's going to flourish. Events like this one need sponsorship. As a start, can any readers who practise IP law, or who work for IP-owning businesses, in the Mersey area, who would like to be more involved in fostering local IP interest and who could offer some sponsorship - however small - please contact Joseph and let him know.
Please see my comments and links below to visit their blogs. You may even consider joining their followers.
At the same time I cut my shamrock, I cut the letters LUCK from the same gold vinyl. I absolutely love being able to do exactly what you want in the same project...add a text box on the same page as a shape; choose the font from what's already installed on your computer etc.
Thomas said he was aware that Mrs. Obama also visited Luray Caverns last year (that trip included a visit to Monticello, too, in July of 2009), but added that he never imagined the First Lady would be in his restaurant. He said he was told that the Secret Service had checked out A Moment To Remember twice before Mrs. Obama's visit, last Saturday and again on Monday. He had no idea the restaurant was being observed, but he was pleased the eatery had passed muster.
If I’m a super-recognizer, then I don’t know if this idea of super-recognizers having more holistic perception with less focus on individual elements explains the difference between us and people with normal levels of ability. I do very much notice individual elements of faces, consciously and unconsciously, as well as recognizing whole faces in a way that feels automatic and uncontrolled. I will notice if different people have mouths or ears that look similar and also distinctive. I recall that a boy I knew when I was a teen and he was a child had a William Shatner mouth, which is a quite an unusual type of mouth where the upper lip looks the larger. Barack Obama and Nelson Mandela seem to have very similar smiles and lower faces, but not identical faces. I think the difference between a super-recognizer and a regular recognizer might be that the former does both holisitc and detailed perception well and also in a well-integrated manner. I believe enhanced brain wiring akin to synaesthesia might be the basis of this enhanced integration of both modes of perception. I suspect that an emphasis on perceiving faces feature-by-feature might be more characteristic of poor face recognition than good face recognition. In the recent CBS 60 Minutes story about prosopagnosia and super-recognizers the prosopagnosic artist Chuck Close was asked to identify the faces of some famous people. He did manage to identify some of the faces and he explained how he did it. He identified Jay Leno from his very unusual chin and picked Tiger Woods from his lips.
First of all, I would kindly ask all of you to take your expectations for this review and dispose of them in a way you see fit; as this elongated piece of text will likely turn out to be less of a conventional review and more of a plea to the governing forces for some form of closure or a token to compensate for the damage inflicted on my poor little emotions during the reading of this novel. If you were to ask me, in a manner that denotes a certain lack of interest, what exactly within this novel violated my feelings so, then I would splutter out a list of mostly incoherent things, and the most coherent of which shall be chronicled here in an effort to convince you to let this book toy with your feelings as well.
I’ve been avoiding wordpress for a while so as not to spread negative energy. From my previous posts, it’s been over 2 months now that I’ve been really low. Yes there are highs, that don’t last more than a few hours. At the point of wondering why I’m alive while nothing in my white room moves except for the clock, the electric fan, my eyeballs and my breathing, I thought of seeking treatment already. Okay, enough.
I didn't fully believe them.
here's the deal:
I read all of the reviews for this top on Patternreview.com and everyone who made it disliked the bias tape finish along the neckline. I, however, do like bias tape and cannot get the hang of clear elastic to save my life. So I finished my neckline and my armholes with bias tape and am really liking the results.
Myth: Obama could sell his end of the bargain to Democrats…. Reality: He probably could have.
2. Good Morning Blues
I happened to be going home that day, and the girls in the house did not want the leftovers. Therefore, I took these chicken salad pockets to my family. They enjoyed them so much that we have been making them ever since.
He shook his head. "You're a terrible liar."
But the more I began to investigate this awesome little essay…I found a few new facts and a mystery…
Michael Gerson -- who was one of George W Bush's writers -- was really good. W's speeches are as good as JFK's -- I'd even rank them higher.
A week doesn't go by when I don't create something. This is an ATC for a swap. Its not digital...I still love cutting and pasting. I like my little works of art to tell a story and this one amuses me.
Anyway, I think you should consider checking with your constituency and making sure you are truly representing our interests in this whole payroll tax thing. I think both Republicans and Democrats support not raising everyone's taxes by $1000-1500. The difference seems to be in how to fund it.
All four cards we created feature the new "Good Day, Sunshine" collection from We R Memory Keepers. This collection just arrived in the store and it called out for me to create with it ;) It's a springy version of one of my favourite colour schemes, and let me tell you... I'm ready for spring! This collection is not available in 6x6 pads, but we have 2 different 12x12 sheets which feature 6x6 patterns on the back and for the most part, those are what we used for this class.
The City. The opportunities you have here, and which you would have nowhere else. Being able to walk down the street in PJ’s and not being looked at like a freak. Dressing up after work just to hit up happy hour in the City. Brunch on the weekends. The free things you can do every single day, no matter what the weather is.
What do you think about this one?!
Maclays have refurbished the place somewhat in the last few years so that there are more tables to have something to eat at (apart from their famous pies) in the side room, but the bar area's still pretty much the same (long and narrow) and can get really busy when there's a big sporting event on as per today. We quite happily had a few great pints of Fyne Ales Jarl, Stewart Forth Mist and Knops California Common (quite caramely today) watching the game come to life in the last 30 minutes - can't really ask for much better than that - except for the result to be different I guess!
It’s been written, you’ve come to the conculsion of your story. Joy, Elation! Congratulations you’ve finished a full length novel. Many dream, many aspire, and you’ve completed the goal: to write “The End.”
When E first reacted, I instinctively gave Benadryl and called his pediatrician, who told me to take him to the hospital. If, God forbid, he ever has another reaction, I will give the Benadryl and EpiPen and then call an ambulance, rather than taking him to the hospital myself. Even though I was very familiar with food allergies, I had no clue about how serious they could be. Now I know. Educating more people about them can mean fewer little lives lost to them.
As I’ve just mentioned to my wife who is watching the Manchester derby at the moment, Danny Welbeck is statistically the wrong player to bring on in this situation having not scored a goal when United are behind all season. Same goes for all of the above players.
Christmas Morning Breakfast Casserole (make this up the night before and pop it in the oven in the morning)
A collection of 150 psalms, whose Hebrew name is “The Book of Praise.” Authors of individual psalms include David, Solomon, Moses, Asaph, and others who are anonymous. The variety and unity of Psalms have given this book a unique place in the devotional life of the individual and the Church. Almost every aspect of man’s relation to God is depicted in these poems: simple trust, the sense of sin, appeal to a higher power in time of trouble, and the conviction that the world is in the hands of a loving God.
The first question invites us to see the “gift and interconnectedness of life”. This is about being aware of someone giving you a paper clip, as well as the unknown farmer who grew the coffee beans for your coffee.
He felt electric currents run through his body, draining all life towards his groin. He grew bigger inside his wife. Cold sweat run alongside his back, but he didn’t have time or presence of mind to notice it. Instead, he let his body slump into the mattress, flinging his arms wide and his head back, and let the two women, merged into one, use him, suck the life out of him and into their warm, wet insides.
The ‘Keeling curve’, which shows annual carbon dioxide concentrations since 1958, was thus revealed to be utterly inaccurate. As one atmospheric physicist conceded anonymously, “I guess the combustion in oxygen of billions of tonnes of organic carbon didn’t actually result in carbon dioxide going in to the atmosphere after all.”
Its shape
Even if it is ok to make new prints from a legal perspective, is it worth potentially alienating your market by bringing out new editions on a regular basis? Clearly if an artist regularly brings out new “limited editions” he or she will ultimately erode the value in all previous works and reduce the likelihood of purchasers continuing to buy the work.
Put them in the oven. I'd say 12-15 minutes. But watch them. If they start to brown--get them out!!! They burn very easy!!
Doctor Adoulla has been battling ghuls for decades and we encounter him near the end of his tenure as the greatest ghul hunter in the Crescent Moon Kingdoms at a point where his role has been marginalized. He isn't sad about being forgotten--to a degree--in fact he would love to finally retire and pass on the mantle. Yet a threat has surfaced that tests his abilities and that of his young dervish protege. It is Adoulla's lifetime of experience that sets him apart from so many warriors in their prime and magicians seeking to make a name for themselves that seem to proliferate Fantasy. He's the uncle with all the best stories.
Call all of it part of "Bloggers in the Archive," and suddenly collections all over the world are being appreciated and seen by more than the five professors who have been deemed qualified enough to explore a specific phase in architecture, design, or landscape history. Put Tim Maly up at the Reuleaux Collection of Mechanisms and Machines for two weeks, or Bruce Sterling at the National Science Foundation.
you get to think of things that you normally never would think of,
I looked back through some of the emails I had received from her and found it interesting that this was the last line of the last email she sent to me a few weeks ago:
It says I am a good person, I have some psychic ability, and it will be happy to help me develop this. Whereas, there are of course opportunities for me in work and in love, and it is for me to see them and welcome them and realise them, not to fantasise at my keyboard.
she talked about it for weeks -
(SALAD OF TOSSED STEAMED CORN,SPINACH,GRATED COTTAGE CHEESE N CARROT,TOMS,RED ONIONS,PURPLE CABBAGE ,ICE BERG ,PARSELY,CILANTRO W A FRESH LIME JUICE AND HONEY DRESSING)
My flaws bow deeply before the inborn perfection;
October ’10 Thirty-one GSA employees traveled to the M Resort for a “dry run” of the conference to be held later that month.
This little sweetheart is called "Party Hardy" and she's the brainchild of the very talented Krista Smith of Saturated Canary. I decided to make one of these fun "shaped" cards . . . and, I tell ya, it was so simple to make . . . but makes a big statement, don'tcha think? Here's a close up . . .
“Touch not My anointed and do
Actually it was Flo's Diner Dash.
At some point, you'll probably want to explore other awesome alternatives (all porcine, I'm afraid) featuring treats such as char siu, kho, head cheese and by-any-other-name meatballs/sausage patties.
Donnelly explained the problem has been developing for some time. She cited the 1997 recommendation from the Kassebaum-Baker Commission for the Army to end the gender-integrated basic training, because it was “resulting in less discipline, less unit cohesion, and more distraction from training.”
For what?
Psssst. Tina. I saw him first. Now back off, bitch!
Where’s Paul Priest, James Preece, me and Mac?
Baby Girl, I love you but could you please make some room for my lunch?! My mind thinks I’m starving but my belly thinks otherwise.
She returns with a deconstructed business envelope and says, "I just pulled this one apart and noticed how it's a parallelogram, then I made another one, but small."
Alpha Bakes - Caroline Makes and Ros of The more than occasional baker take it in turns to pick a random letter from the alphabet which inspires the theme of the bake. This month Caroline picked H and my H is for Honey Cakes.
Truman Wiley used to report news stories from around the world, but now the most troubling headlines are his own. He’s out of work, out of touch with his family, out of his home. But nothing dogs him more than his son’s failing heart.
So what's been happening in my little world (love that song 'come fill my little world right up, right up')
This sounds like somebody trying to put a Christian cover on a non-christian practice, and if you are willing to buy it, I have a genuine Ralex watch I would like to sell you.
Twice as many followers of Aelfric as there are characters emerge from the gate to do battle. They have their armor on, which is an advantage they have over the PCs, but the PCs are presumably mounted and the bandits have no time to arrange a Scudburh so long as the players attack them quickly. The runes on the hands and tongue of the heir do not activate unless things are going poorly for him. After half of these bandits die, they retreat back inside.
106.2% Federal Debt As A Share Of GDP At The End Of 2013. (CBO, 2/13/12)
I had just inhaled deeply on my post coital cigarette and was propped up on two pillows. He was still lying quite flat looking up at me. “So what am I thinking?” I asked, slowly and thoughtfully exhaling a long plume of bluish-grey smoke.
Imogen: Yes, and on my sign for recycling I'm drawing empty bottles and broken bathtubs.
Emerging Dancer winner, Yonah Acosta, also performed a crowd-pleasing Don Quixote solo with effortless strength and precision. Most wonderful to see (from my gallery viewing-position) was Klimentova straining her neck backstage to watch the young Cuban’s performance. Clearly Acosta is a talent that makes even the brightest company stars take notice.
Because you can locate that empty ground in your very own experience, you can also locate the seed of everything that came out of that nothingness. The essence of evolutionary enlightenment is found in that precise moment when nothing became something. When you contemplate the ground of being, you can begin to intuit for yourself what that very moment must have been like…
Three steps are presented in Andy Stanley’s excellent book Visioneering, using Nehemiah as a model for handling criticism. We go back to these steps in times of rejection and criticism.
Obviously, yes, I’m sure a lot of the 8200 hits to the Houston blog are not full readers, but for a blog that normally gets four to six comments, this one currently has 60. My favourite is the one where I’m called a “fucking idoit”. Actually, that’s a lie. My favourites are from an ex-addict named Colin and a few others who have had to deal with addicts in their lives. The “idoit” one is just plain good times.
The Beano recently had an angry character...though sadly short lived...see Nigel's blog..
When I see this most recent satellite image of the place, I can see that it is a few years old. We have since put all new gravel on the drive. The chicken coop and run were taken down in August. I haven't had chickens since then. I may get a new hen house and re-install a chicken run. At this point, that seems like so much effort!
Those key points would include –
I created an ABC letter box to start out each letter unit. On the first day of the letter study, the girls dig through the box to find the objects. We name all the objects and listen to the first sound the word makes. Then I point to the letter and tell them that this is the letter that makes the /g/ sound. You can find more details about the ABC Letter box and how to use it at Spell Outloud.
Now, omega-3 fatty acids, in combination with a low-fat diet, could help improve men’s health, especially the health of the prostate.
The world-building is interesting with lots of magic. Dwarfs, giants, and vampires are ordinary sights on Ashlund’s streets. Vampires even work as a street whores. Lots of humans can use elemental magic but they can still be homeless or become crazy. It took me awhile to realize that the elementals are just humans, and other people, with magic, and not spirits. Ashlund is throughly corrupt, in fact it reminded me of Gotham without Batman’s influence. The most notable person in the city is the fire elemental Mab Monroe who runs the underworld, and therefore the city.
Kate Spade, J. Crew and Nordstrom are my go-to's ... and I might get slack for this but I can literally spend hours in a TJ Maxx - It's like a treasure hunt! I always get a ton of compliments on TJ finds and my friends are always shocked when I tell them where they're from which makes me grin. In Europe, I shop a lot at Zara and h&m. I also adore shopping vintage! Oh, and it's hard to beat my parents' closets - my current favorite piece to wear is my Dad's chambray shirt from the 1960s. My Mom even hand-embroidered two butterflies on the back and did stitching around the pockets and buttons
ARG! We interrupt this blog post to report another strong evidence of Groovy's mediocrity at blogging. She can upload pics. But can she arrange them and put them where she wants them in the post? NOOOOOOOOOOO!
Entries must be uploaded to the SCS gallery and use at least one Flower Soft product (Flower Soft, toppers, stamps) to be eligible to win. Please use the keyword FSC16 and flowersoft (one word) when uploading to the gallery so we can find your project.
Charge up new Garmin and set it up as needed. (Let's not be looking at this for the first time on Saturday, okay?) It's the same as my old one, so this shouldn't be too difficult, right?
3. I once watched a snapping turtle try to dig a hole for hours to deposit her eggs. Seeing that she wasn’t getting too far, I went out and dug a hole right by her and she moved over and used that hole. (I can feel a new blog post coming on..lol)
These actors have done away with any semblance of forethought. Their instances of shock and romance have all the nuances of reality. If you follow their eye-lines, you can see their realizations. It is easy to participate in these characters decisions, precisely because these nuances feel so real. The reactions they have are as close of a representation of what we might be like in that situation as I can imagine.
1 x 1088BEWE Sexy Bra Set = RM22.50
This giveaway closes midnight E.S.T. on Friday, August 12th. Winner will be chosen by Random.org. Due to shipping costs, this giveaway is open to U.S. residents only--sorry!
I. Derere Gonzonga. 2. Chidyausiku. 3. Ngarande. 4. Marembo. 5. Wambe. 6. Rusere. 7. Charakupa. and other sons and daughters. *
MM: I didn't think we were doing presents?
read from Tesla's autobiography
1439 D-X/17(A)/2002. “Abraham Lincoln’s Shakespeare.” Rochester Institute of Technology, Rochester, New York.
I chatted with my therapist online last night… first can I just say, therapy has definitely evolved. From clinic to office couch to home offices to online chats/support groups, etc. Fast pace world, ability to travel, evolution of technology. It’s amazing. The provisions of therapeutic counseling or services offered over the internet via email, chat, audio and video blow my mind. Some of my friends have asked, why online therapy? In return I say, why therapy? Really… People go to therapy because it works. I asked my therapist this last night if Iwould ever be better, if my brain would stop remembering and then spent the next half-hour researching it. So far.. studies say, “It works!”
DK Boscage Climber refines the ablaze and alive visuals of DK King of Swing, which itself adopted its agreeableness from the Donkey Kong Country games. Bigger resolution agency that both screens are abiding with detail, admitting it aswell ends up authoritative Donkey Kong arise adequately babyish onscreen. Ultimately, though, accepting able to see added of the ambiance is added cogent to the gameplay than a bigger DK sprite, admitting how abundant we adore watching his dangling legs exhausted about.
Still they sat, dozing,
A way to escape,
The seamen had to know their position lest they fall into destruction on the rocks. We ought also to know our position in Christ, lest Satan should get an advantage over us for we are not ignorant of his devices as we read in 2 Corinthians 23:11. You will only learn of Satan’s devices through the Word of God. Otherwise he can bewitch you as he did the Galatians in 3:1.
ps - Just 5 minutes a day of these exercises can help you. You don't even have to lay down and take time out of your day (although you should give yourself a break). You can practice your inner core engagement while you are sitting at your desk, waiting for a stop light, doing dishes, or any time you think of it.
Our God, our God, we bow to Thee,
Hey remember that house from the last post? Hold that vision in your head for a second. Okay ready? Now throw it away! Yep as far away as humanly possible. I feel like throwing some other objects. UGH!
My garden tools live where hers did. My hanging baskets swing from the eye hooks placed there by my grandfather. The scent of mock orange wafts through the house on a spring breeze the second week of May each year, and the lilacs bloom right on schedule.
I thought he was going to bring to me to a traditional place where he and I would eat. I thought I’ll just offer to pay for his lunch, just a small act of gratitude. We drove for 30 minutes to the city. We were in downtown Yogyakarta when his car suddenly broke down. His car overheated and we had to stop. He got some water and put it in this engine and after 20 minutes we were back on the road. He handed the situation well, but this was a large thumbs down for me.
Anyways, what else is going on?? My shower is this weekend and I'm so excited! Feels like it's been on the books forever!! My mom is coming into town on Thursday and I could not be more happy to have her be here! My friend Angela is also coming to town as well so it'll be a full house. Lots of fun!! AND, my girlfriends at work are throwing me a "Open House" in a couple of weeks as well for my work peeps. I do not for a minute not realize how lucky I am to have such great friends!!!
Reviewed on September 27th, 2007.
If you’re like me and prefer your conferences to be as paper-free as possible, there’s nothing like an app that takes the place of those big program books. We’ve been hard at work creating an app that is robust yet easy to navigate, so I’m thrilled to announce the launch of the 2012 ARVO Mobile Meeting Planner, our interactive mobile app that’s been designed to help you access Annual Meeting information on-the-go. Here’s a screenshot of what it looks like:
As my post on my other blog details, I've been busy writing, running around, wrapping presents, decorating, baking, and doing a lot of other junk.
Clearly they capture my love of color, and people and life... in a big way.
Besides, with the current stormy weather in the San Francisco Bay Area, I thought this would be the perfect time to have warm Bahamian Chicken Souse!
Hello everyone and welcome to our next challenge here at Hookedoncraft and thanks to all who entered our last challenge. From now on our challenges will be monthly.
No purchase necessary to enter (one may use from one's EvaDress pattern stash).
paid: $6.58
Me: "I was approaching it from the angle of making the uterus more sticky, but making the babies more sticky would also work. How do you propose we make the babies stickier?"
Based on the Channel 4 investigation, young black men of Afro Caribbean origin are committing more than five times as many gang rapes as young white men. However, the discrepancy is far greater than that, given that people of Afro-Caribbean origin are estimated to make up around 6% of the population, whilst whites are around 80% (down from 90% in 1999) by these figures, which nobody has disputed, their propensity to commit gang rape exceeds that of white youths by thousands of percent. (Perhaps someone better at maths than I can provide an accurate percentage.)
We had anticipated having all of our family here for Christmas but my one eldest son, who is living in Taiwan right now. He told us he simply could not make it: no possible way, absolutely could not make it happen. That was to be very sad for us all, as everyone else was coming, and he happens to be the life of the party...the tease, the comedian, etc. How boring for us to have him missing!
Telephone : 0114 242 0716
These are the papers that I ordered from Stampington, and I just LOVE them! And as an added bonus, I discovered the artist--Donna Estabrooks---she is the artist that designed these papers, and before this I didn't know who she was, but I sure do now--just go to her website and you'll see what I mean. If you like lots of color and whimsy, you'll love her too--well...... just look at these papers!
Our worker had scheduled the home inspection for the early afternoon, and we went through everything we needed to go through. She informed us that we were certified at that point, and that she’d send us the certificate after she officially processed it all! She hung around a bit longer than she needed to, hoping to be there to meet E-girl, but finally had to leave. At that point there was nothing left to do. We had prepared the room as much as we could at that point (still needed to go buy bunk beds for her brothers and sisters but that would wait a day or two), so we waited. We had decided to put up Christmas lights that year because we would have children who would most likely expect it, so began doing that on the front of the house. We were in the yard when that van pulled up with a little four-year-old who was as scared as could be and screaming at the top of her lungs. I’ve already told the story from this point on in other posts. If you haven’t already read them, then you can read about that first week with just E-girl, and also about my first impression as I took my first look at that screaming child!
The giant banking corporations have siphoned off so much of the economy under our klept-o-cratic government that their share now threatens to exceed Limbaugh’s weight. The top four banks have assets equal to 52 percent of U.S. gross domestic product. They didn’t siphon off all this wealth by natural selection or free enterprise. They paid off people in government to put the fix in, fashioning legislation that made it inevitable. These banks need to be taken apart, the same way we took apart AT&T almost thirty years ago.
Kami had a great return visit with her Radiology Oncologist and the good report on this is, she has already gained 6 lbs. ...Good job Kami...keep it up!
My Perfectly Paisley quilt top is ready to be quilted. But, yes there is a but, I don't like the size. I don't feel it is long enough for a lap quilt. I am thinking about adding some fabric to the top and bottom. What do you think?
John 1:1-7, 19-20, 29-34
I just want to see it. Truthfully, I don’t have much interest in the rest of South Dakota (too cold, I think), but I have heard that the monument is a sight to behold. Plus, this is realistically within road trip territory.
First up is Sooryehan, a mid-range brand which can be found both at select DFS counters and also drugstores. I bought 3 base makeup items from Olive Young which was running a discount on most Sooryehan products, and the Whitening set from Beaute store in Myeongdong.
She looks ethereal, breathtaking, and dare I say...vampiric.
3 lb. Venison or Beef Roast
It was NOT me that rather than being angry with my daughter smiled when I saw that she had colored on every drawer of her dresser. It did NOT give me a little bit of pleasure as it hit me that "I'm a mom!" and this is what mom's deal with. (And if my daughter DID do such a thing she would have wisely chosen to do so with chalk so it was easily wiped off with a sock).
The Trumpeter of Krakow ~ by Eric P. Kelly (Poland)
I think I'd like to send this question to them (as I am sure it will likely get me a 95% approval rating from other speed daters): Where is the strangest place you have vomited and why? Please be specific in your answers.
The biggest issue here is the lack of team play in the NBA. I don’t want to sit here and continue to criticize the NBA because I do like sports and I enjoy the NBA playoffs. But the Bobcats really go to show the bigger issue here. Many people, don’t support the NBA because there is such a lack of team. Charlotte is just another example of the NBA’s problem. Lack of team play. Maybe their lack of success will force NBA players to look into the team effort. There are always going to be the star players, but maybe these stars will step up and raise the perception of their team and the overall NBA.
Every now and again an actor takes his career on an almost perfect journey and you can see them become a better, wiser actor in the process. Anyone who remembers Michael Shannon as far back as his bit role in Groundhog Day, has seen this happen to him. Early in his career he took roles whose purpose was purely to act and not necessarily all that selective, but hey, an actors gotta work. No one would have watched Kangaroo Jack and predicted that he would be one of the best and most under appreciated actors working today. He was and is a hard working actor that has since proved his ability to make his mark in a film and now carry one on his back.
But in France, if Najib were to ignore a call to answer questions in relation to the DCN sale in which he as the Defense minister in 2002 had sanctioned, it would immediately raise eyebrows. Already the diplomatic corp is whispering about his greed and indiscretions. It would certainly not do for it to be officially recorded that Najib – the Malaysian PM – had failed to respond to what is a perfectly normal request that any RESPONSIBLE person, what more a leader, should willing agree to.
land, nevertheless her unyielding sweet voice heard, the echoes
Hutong - If you want to have a blow out dinner head to in Kowloon, this amazing restaurant is styled like a Chinese village. Make sure you order the lantern chicken for which they are well known. If you're on a budget, head up to Aqua for one drink which is above Hutong, another amazing view of the HK skyline which is indoors if the weather is bad.
Reference: Submission of joint proposal for Grants
People talk about "online" friends and "real-world" friends. Sometimes the "online" ones are are dismissed as being less than authentic. Weaker. Frivolous. But the truth is, some of the strongest friendships I've made in recent years are ones that have formed digitally. Friends are friends, period. It just so happens that today's technology makes it incredibly easy for many of these friendships to be forged online.
Making my choice with the vendors hand on my arm is simply easier than making a rational choice on the facts - which I will not have all of. Surrounded by drifts of near-identical stuff, on my own always, the cognitive load is overwhelming.
The Paris Opera House is renowned for its extravagant performances, but it is also plagued by a mysterious “Opera Ghost.” He makes demands of the show’s producers under penalty of sabotage. He threatens the star of the show, Carlotta (Mary Fabian), and her mother (Virginia Pearson) and adviser her to be “ill” for a show so that her understudy, Christine Daae (Mary Philbin), may take her place. The Phantom hides in hidden passages throughout the Opera House, and has been helping Christine become a better singer. His motives are not entirely altruistic. He is madly in love with Christine and wants to take her to his subterranean home to live with him forever. However, Christine is in love with Vicomte Raoul de Chagny (Norman Kerry) and he feels the same. Erik, the Phantom, is rather the jealous type…
“The ethnic Chinese in Singapore were descendants of illiterate coolies and farmers from southern Fujian. This had made them less able than the people of Hong Kong or Taiwan, whose ancestors were mainly businessman or technocrats.”
No matter the age, the more the five senses are involved in the learning process the better the learner engages. Together we will explore how to take a story from Scripture and make it come to life in a variety of ways that engage the learner. It will help eliminate boredom in your classroom. It will make your message “sticky”—so that everyone in your class walks away with something.
I made a mask by stamping the stunning dog rose stamp onto a post it note and cutting it out with my sharp paper snips. The mask was stuck to the card front and I stamped over it with my script image. When the mask was peeled away, I stamped another dog rose in the space left for it - using my stamp-a-majig for accurate positioning.
Meanwhile, a young ronin named Masanosuke Akitsu has come to Edo looking for a job that suits his talents seeing as he was fired by his employer who considers the young samurai as “undependable” for some very obvious personality reasons. With no jobs available, Akitsu decides to accept a job offer from a handsome young man with white hair who needs a good bodyguard to accompany him. As it turns out, this man named Yaichi needs a bodyguard to oversee a ransom delivery. You see, Yaichi is leader of a band of kidnappers for a group of criminals calling themselves the Five Leaves.
Im staring to feel excited about my adventure
Sunburst is brewed with Maris Otter pale malt and a multi-cultural blend of Cascade (USA), Styrian Golding and Challenger (UK) hops*. It's lager-gold in colour with a slight haze which, when you consider it's a filtered beer, is a little confusing. I get that grapefruit flavour that's synonymous with Cascades right at the end of the tail, before that comes lots of lemon, like lemon balm or lemon curd maybe, lemon but thick in texture, lemon muted by sweetness. Lemon sherbets before you get to the fizzy bit! And then after all that hop comes a grainy finish, a little like biscuits, a little cereal, right at the end there as it starts to dry out. I think that grainy flavour is a product of Maris Otter malt, it just seems to have character about it that other pale malts don't.
Thus, when a man come to the end of his days, Belloc thinks, "on the downward slope" where he sees "the marble tomb," he sees on either side of him these two companions, follies and sins. "They talk to him continually." He says to himself, in my words, "Oh no! of that folly" and "God forgive me of that sin." Our follies and our sins need to be reckoned with. If we do not, "we should make very poor wayfaring with them at the end." When we do come to the end, we notice that we have lost the "other friends and fellowships." What we have left are our follies and our sins. We even strike up a conversation with ourselves, Belloc thinks, "Good morning, my dear Folly Number 8!" Then he feels his sleeve being pulled for attention, and responds, "Good-morning, Sin Number 368. Remember me to all the little sins."
Meanwhile, combine the sugar, light corn syrup and 2 tablespoons water in a medium heavy-bottomed saucepan. Heat over low heat, until the sugar dissolves, then increase the heat to medium-high. Cook, without stirring, only swirling the pan from time to time so it cooks evenly, until the sugar mixture turns a deep amber color (about 7-10 minutes).
Cried with my friends
and slow
Gonna get me a conscience,
"I'm a Lady of the night," she says.
The dog’s breed is not the main issue in this case. The much larger issue is the fact that the owner was completely irresponsible.
IAN: I'm running a contest/puzzle on my website right now! First prize is a signed advanced review copy of Bitter Seeds. Details on the contest and some hints on how to play can be found in several entries on my blog, starting here.
Layer potato slices on the bottom of the oven dish, then a layer of onions. Repeat, topping out with a layer of potato.
Just right for me... ;-)
I actually finished my card Monday morning after looking in my bible for a note I'd written myself on the inside cover, it said, "I want where I've been to impact where I'm going..." I wrote it at the time I was going through the Celebrate Recovery program at our church. I realized I should turn that into a short prayer for my angel on my card. I used my Word program to generate my text and cut it out with a Spellbindders tag die and added a couple more stars to repeat the star pattern in the image and a couple of white half pearls to finish it off. It feels done now...
I was happy when it was time to head to dinner with my dear friend Beth & her husband Damian (neither of whom are artists), so that I could leave the pondering of whys behind. So I'm sure you can guess what one of the first questions out of Damian's mouth was....and then the next morning at Blicks while discussing rendering with an architect I got the same question.
MAY MYSTERY BOX CHALLENGE
Electrical System – The Chi Machine allows the body’s 32 figure 8’s electrical field to be put into motion, which assists brain integration and aids the thought process.
Gareth is also still our county councillor, as he was unopposed.
Secondly … the recipes are stellar. For realz. Kelly has a love of food that just jumps off the page …
8. Craft Gossip
Training was tough, but dieting was even harder. I can say with confidence now that training is only 20% of the battle, it is the dieting that will often make or break your progress because it must be monitored 24/7. Never in my life had I felt guilty for eating fruit—but here I was, sneaking bananas and grapes and thinking myself crazy! In fact, I can remember breaking down and buying a bag full of discounted Easter candy just two weeks before the show! I was counting down the days until I could indulge without hating myself afterwards.
A shrill wail at these losses, this pain
They devoted themselves to the apostles teaching and to the fellowship, to the breaking of bread and to prayer. Everyone was filled with awe, and many wonders and miraculous signs were done by the apostles. All the believers were together and had everything in common. Selling their possessions and goods, they gave to anyone as he had need. Every day they continued to meet together in the temple courts. They broke bread in their homes and ate together with glad and sincere hearts, praising God and enjoying the favor of all the people. And the Lord added to their number daily those who were being saved.
Do you have a cavity yet? I know. A little ridiculous. But it's fun to shop around for pretty cake plates and display jars. Let's just hope it all comes together! We're excited but also super nervous. I guess most people are for their wedding day right?
It also happens to be one of the most mouth-watering reading experiences I have ever had. Packed with recipes and with entire chapters given over to the sensual description of French foodstuffs, The Sweet Life In Paris makes you hungry just reading it.
I’ve been slacking on here recently. However, there is a perfectly legitimate reason! I promise.
But then I found myself propping up the bar with Kurt and Ian.
You're supposed to protect me, that's what parents do...
"Today you are in much better health than before your heart attack".
This should really be called "crock pot chicken a million ways" because there are seriously endless uses for this chicken. But these are the 3 ways I used it.
as only you can
He accused Cao of a “blatant push shot”, which, replays have shown to be inconclusive. He then went on to say “It seems to be a bit of a trait for the Chinese players because there’ve been instances in the past, of fouls and blatant cheating going on. It needs to be corrected.”
ahead of the weekday road, what lowers
Here’s what I know because my mom told me so: she used to say “If you don’t do it with a good attitude, it doesn’t count.” This was usually in reference to the three more bites of my dinner she was trying to get me to eat but it extended to larger issues. The truth is, like most kids, I could be a total jerk. I would pull on her skirt in public places and wrap myself around her leg while whining that I wanted to go, or wanted some sugary snack (which I never got) or that she was talking to someone too long. It was at these moments that she would stop, look me straight in the eye and tell me that it was time to change my attitude. The lesson was that there are multiple components to each interaction. One component was the actual function—eating my broccoli—but the second, more important one was the outlook I would bring to the situation. Ah, grasshopper, beginner’s mind indeed.
It seemed the best thing to be up and go.
So thanks to The Ranting Chef for the award, and also for the inspiration for that last post that resulted in a tasty recipe (and those chocolate peanut butter brownies).
I transfixed her with my ghostly eyes
self-awareness, I ask those that I may have
· Nature-themed rubber stamp for each child. Have them pick a design that has personal meaning.
My special needs daughter had a number of medical issues. I had other personal concerns, too. In all, it was a difficult, exhausting time.
I am loathe to be another person banging their drum about Divergent and how good it is. I read Divergent some months ago, because Zoe Marriott could not shut up about it. She won a copy directly from Veronica Roth and the copy was annotated with these tiny yellow stickys in which Veronica had given glimpses about things like music she listened to whilst she wrote certain scenes etc. I discreetly asked Zoe for her copy and she in turn told Lynsey Newton to pass it on to me to read and it was eventually sent to me with a sticker that said this:
He brought with him dietary and exercise regimes – his strict but kindly influence extended into the players’ private lives, with rules on keeping in shape and what kind of foods to avoid. Players started stepping out on to the pitch with gloopy blotches down the front of their shirts – apparently some kind of decongestant – and there was talk, of course, of supplements.
Preventative Health Taskforce. Australia: the healthiest country by 2020. National Preventative Health Strategy. Canberra: Commonwealth of Australia, 2009.
With a whisper, quiet as a lullaby,
the trumpets and drums!
back door. A waiter soon arrived and bought me green tea. I ordered a small
for these flowers, i started with a 6x6 square of cardstock. i rounded the corners (doesn't have to be perfect) and then, using regular scissors, cut into paper like a circle, but creating a spiral shape, trying to leave about 2cm in between cuts. when you get to the center of the paper, leave about the size of a nickel un-cut. starting with the outside, roll the paper around a pencil until you get to the "nickel" piece. here you can keep the flower tight or let it loose if you'd like, i let mine go just a bit.
And I still get emails from people who want updates, which is totally normal and expected. It's not normal for someone to disappear from your life like that, poof! without some reason why. I can't explain it myself and the last thing I've wanted to do is cause others to doubt K and the fact that she truly needed us, and that we truly helped her. Because we did and that is something I DO know.
Another argument that Fox has for vegetarianism is that “the meat industry…is ushering in an era of activities that are totally lacking in compassion or a sense of connection with nature” (501-2). We constantly treat animals as our possessions and as instruments for the satisfaction of our own interests. Cows are mindlessly slaughtered in large numbers, while chickens and pigs are bred in cages that barely allow them to grow normally. Fox seems to hold the view that we have a moral obligation to nature and to the protection of the environment because, as humans, we also belong to nature. He states, “Vegetarianism encourages us to think of ourselves as part of nature rather than apart from nature” (502). Having meat-based diets shows an anthropological view of the relationship between humans and nature; our interests appear to be more important than the interests of the environment, since our consumption of meat has such detrimental effects upon nature. Vegetarianism should be adopted because it “recognizes the importance of ecologically sustainable human activity and affirms the requirement that we seek to minimize our impact on the planet” (502). According to Fox, we should make this switch because it “entails compassionate cohabitation with other species and respect for the earth to the greatest extent” (502). By considering what benefits the environment and other species as well as us, a dietary change can turn our current environmental impact into a minimal negative effect on nature. Vegetarianism, essentially, seems to be the only viable environmentally friendly option.
Prisoners in Quatro behaved like frightened zombies, who would nervously jump in panic just at the sight of commanders, let alone at a rebuke or a beating.
new growth forms naturally,
Superior the bike is to the car.
FederalObserver.com
“Federal law enforcement” agents conducting “emergency response activities” in the name of “environmental justice” for the purpose of “securing the homeland.” The Green Police. Oh. My. God.
Becoming a mother changed me. Looking into the eyes of my bonnie, healthy babes makes me want more for the world, more from myself. I constantly wish I could do better, be more, give more generously. I think back to me, pre-motherhood. I am completely unsure what I did with minutes, then. I had so many of them, and I just wasted them! And to have been so emotionally cavalier...nowadays it is a struggle to read the news. The most shocking part of entering motherhood, for me, was how utterly unprepared I was, for the whole thing. For the breathtaking love, for the deep confusion, for the overwhelming protective instinct, for the involuntary guilt reflex, for the dark fears.
Therein lies the difference between us and therein lies the charm...xv
Tokota said the right to be considered for parole should not be equated to the right to be freed from prison.
Tom Dyche
Pat had protested, in vain, that his instruments had been in no way responsible for the combustion. His inventions had been condemned as impractical by the institute's committee, while he himself had been pronounced a failure.
88. “Many of life’s failures are people who did not realise how close they were to success when they gave up.” – Thomas Edison
roll the dough into 18 inch long rope. if the rope shrink to a shorter length, let it sit for a few more minutes and then try again.
The Greatest Sacrifice
9:45: Monkeyboy is screaming in his crib. I go upstairs and pull him out and bring him downstairs.
And for something random, here is some random Japanese humour:
Sunday was the big day...opening of the show!! It's so fun to walk the floor and see all the new products!
Baseball season is about to begin. Spring training for the Giants has already begun in Arizona. And when the weather is nice here, we fly this flag, showing all who drive by that we support our local (albeit Bay Area) team.
The Commercial Appeal posts many strange stories, like the article about Bush Senior parachuting out of an airplane on his eightieth birthday. Next to the article was a photo similar to the one above with the headline: The Aftermath! Apparently that wasn't stranger than other photos because Jay Leno never used it for headline news. So, in order to find something stranger, I searched the internet for bizarre news stories. Are they any "stranger" than what I found in the Commercial Appeal?
I reckon for most people who do it for a living, the worst thing about it is that the lack of dosh. For a dilettante like me, it’s all fun and games. Even when someone loses an eye.
Sl st - slip stitch
They say with a hiss.
How appropriate that, as we approach November 19th and the first anniversary of his untimely death, the legendary Peter Haining should return from the grave with a collection of True Hauntings.
I have only had two sessions, and oh my God it is hard.
Pull-Up ladder
Yes, that's the long-time former host at CBS Radio news/talk KDKA/1020 Pittsburgh, where now-former WKBN morning drive host Robert Mangino has landed in the evening slot.
As we work with ourselves and move through our own fears in life and not let our personal fears dictate our actions, and only act out of love and acceptance, our life will change, our world will change. And as my life changes, I, by my actions, by my example, will allow more change for those around me. My decisions will be based in love. And when it comes to the choices we see people make it the world, with our new awake self, we will see others choices and will be able to discern where their choices are coming from. Not judge, because if we start judging, then, once again, we are coming from fear.
At this time of year, we are grateful for our families, and also organizations like FNPS, which works every day, through grassroots volunteer members, to preserve, conserve and restore the native plants and native plant communities of Florida. As I said in my letter, my childhood experiences led me to being part of FNPS, because I believed in the mission before I even knew there was an FNPS.
The extent of the loss of the tradition of Infant Communion among the Eastern Catholic Churches was noted by Fr. Casimir Kucharek’s Ukrainian Catholic catechism Our Faith: A Byzantine Catechism for Adults. Writing in 1983, he explained:
A Different Kind of Christmas ... LMN ... 2 AM
One order matter not to be ignored is the organization of warranty information. Our homes, closets, and garages are filled with valuable assets. Most of these assets make our lives easier and more enjoyable. Thus, in the unfortunate and stressful event that an appliance fails to perform or a certain product is being recalled, it is critical to have your warranty information and user guides well organized. If you do not have a stress-free system in place to keep track of all the paperwork, I challenge you to try and get your warranties in order.
-You won’t regret standing up for kids who are bullied. It might not make you very popular, but I promise you will never regret stepping in when someone is being mean or inappropriate. (By the way: after high school, no one CARES who was “popular” and who wasn’t, so stop caring about that. It’s a waste of time.)
I have supported Labour consistently for years. I am not, however, a fan of Gordon Brown. I have made that clear for years in my blog. The other day, Brown revealed what many have known for some time that he is a bully, intolerant, unable to communicate with voters on a personal level and, frankly, should never have been prime minister – he lacks the skills for the top job. What I think is, of course, entirely irrelevant, but it is my blog and it is Rive Gauche Friday… my view is that Labour had the opportunity to get rid of Brown on several occasions over the years and they bottled it each time. They are now reaping what they sowed. I won’t support a Brown led Labour Party. I won’t do it, because this is the most important election I have voted in to date and I have changed my mind.
(09-18-29)
This is definitely the biggest meal of the day! After dinner, we usually sit in the living room, where adults fall asleep and the kids play with their new toys. This year we played on the Wii dance party and guitar hero. I have zero coordination so I am truly awful at both! While most people settle down for a small dinner on the evening, we do the complete opposite. About 4 hours later, we hop into the car and travel over to our grandmothers. We are greeted with even more cousins, aunts and uncles and we tuck into her epic traditional Chinese dinner. Lobster, suckling pig, steamed Turbot fish, Roast chicken were all on the menu. My grandmother's house is always chaotic at this time of the year with so many younger cousins running around!
Because of the IoM’s unchallenged influence in setting public health policy, we are all being set up for a military-run mass vaccination campaign funded in part by the Department of Homeland Security and the Department of Defense, and relying on vaccine-tracking information technology from companies like Northrup Grumman, a weapons manufacturer with a history of illegal international arms trafficking. (More details below.)
where you’ve been last.
If they hadn’t gotten the cable repaired by early this afternoon, I was seriously thinking of heading to town later to borrow Benny’s work wi-fi and an empty office space and try to “reach out and touch someone” as the old telephone company commercial jingle said. With the price of gasoline and my back still troubling me from Monday night’s excursion to the Photoshop class (had one of those long, sleepless nights after that), I am so very glad to see all those connection bars without a big red “x” over them. Well, that and the simple fact I was going slightly nuts without my email and Internet.
As I gathered my books and headed out the door I looked back and said good bye to Miss Saltzman. She just smiled back at me looking as beautiful as ever in her white go go boots. As I started to walk down the battle ship gray stairs I really started to feel nauseas. But you see I wasn’t alone, about four other children followed me down. All of us silent, no words ever spoken. “Ronnie are you feeling OK” asked the school bus matron. A friend of my Mom’s whose name always escaped me. I tried to smile at her, but my lips always had a problem arcing up on the sides on a Wednesday afternoon. I always sat in the back of the bus too. Right under the “emergency exit” sign. Maybe hoping it would open up one day and I would just fall out. As the bus driver closed the doors, I closed my eyes.
that said though, I have been playing a little bit and,
The Prinsloo family's youngest daughter, Sharlien, 17, who was also in the house, was not hurt. Police spokesman Johannes Jaftha said the attackers had forced open the front door and immediately started shooting. Pastor Morné Mundey, a good friend of the Prinsloos, was quickly on the scene. "Sharlien's bedroom is on the ground floor. When she heard the shots, she called me immediately. When I arrived, a neighbour had already put Duncan on a drip. "Laetitia was lying motionless on the bed. We first thought she had had a heart attack. "Shortly afterwards, Duncan jnr started doing mouth-to-mouth resuscitation. Only when the paramedics lifted Laetitia off the bed did we realise she had been shot in the side and was already dead," Mundey said. On Thursday Laetitia Prinsloo jnr, 33, the Prinsloos' eldest child, was on the way to the hospital from Hoedspruit. http://www.news24.com/News24/South_Africa/News/0,,2-7-1442_2430234,00.html http://www.news24.com/Beeld/Suid-Afrika/0,,3-975_2430205,00.html
Throw me all the good lines that your spinning head can think of,
(PS. I'm also blaming brown for the lack of posts -- it's just, I didn't want to ruin brown for you all as well, what with the many, many, many photos I've taken featuring ... tada: the colour brown. Ha!)
'Ogopogo, the Movie', with the soundtrack that includes, 'Oh No Ogopogo' and 'Here We Go, Ogopogo, Here We Go', will be coming to a cinema near you.
On the other hand, Horsey does better when he tries out extended storylines, which gives the reader more reward than a lukewarm one-liner to encourage them to read the strip every day. And the best part of the strip, no question, is the drawing. As anyone who is familiar with his editorial cartoons knows, Horsey is one heck of a cartoonist. I'd love to see some of Horsey's Sundays from the series, where he'd have some room to really shine, but unfortunately I've never found any in print, only reprinted (without color) in his book Greatest Hits of the '80s.
In Jack’s world the term ‘fair fight’ didn’t exist.
Things to remember:
Some additional findings...
Raw Sugar - 1/4 cup
But the exercise reminded us that we each get precisely the same amount of time, no matter how we want to divide or decorate our little boxes. When we take a hard look at how we spend our time, we'd probably be amazed at how much time we're not utilizing well. How much television are we watching? How much Internet wandering? Are we exercising enough or not enough? Can we make a pot of soup that can nourish us for several days or do we feel the need to whip up something fresh each day?
This weekend we were at a church retreat for the 3-10 year old set. As such, lots of parents were there with their kids. I was really surprised at how much stern parenting I saw. Now, I have no problem with using a stern voice with the babes. Today, it struck me that maybe I use it too often and maybe I should relax a bit and try to be more gentle. I guess I saw myself magnified in the people around me. It sort of made me sad to see how stern and seemingly heartless alot of the parents were.
Icy velvet drapes wrapping my limbs
Sometimes a cause or topic is important enough that you will keep bringing it up and even ask your friends to pass on the information....this is one of those posts. Just so ya know.
- I am worthless
-(5) winners will be invited to a private webinar + query, synopsis + 5 page critique with superagent Natalie Fischer
This Conference believes that CAMRA policy should recognise that “Craft Beer” is beer with a distinctive flavour brewed by artisans. As a consequence, most real ales are craft beers but not all craft beers are real ale and CAMRA’s communication should reflect this.
While eating these Roxy and I decided these were the perfect college treat.
It seems you inwardly grin as you pass
So here I am drinking this very Berri flavored creamy substance that reminds me of what women go through with a man during foreplay, I am just thankful this is a one time experience, to do that to please someone would have to come up with a chocolate flavored cream to handle my gag reflex.
* Before you begin the agent hunt, you must have a completed, polished manuscript. Make sure you have had it critiqued by more than your spouse, your mother, or your nine-year old child. Other writers are the best critiquers. Run as fast as you can to join a critique group.
Removing Clutter From Your Child’s Room
The network still struggles with race and gender issues. Miller and Shales give appropriate and critical treatment to the challenges faced by minority and female employees. Bill Creasy, an ESPN executive is actually quoted saying this: “I’m a great believer in having a lot of women around you while you work…I know it’s quite sexist, but when you have a pretty girl around the office, it’s a little bit happier than having an ugly girl.” Sort of inappropriately funny, but not at all when you think about Erin Andrews having her privacy violated by a sick fan. While I’m not sure the ESPN we know today could have been borne of anything but a frat-house culture, the male-dominated culture led to real problems for those who worked there.
God I love a good pair of boots...maybe just one pair...I've been so good...
I like the distraction. I watched The Help when the girls were gone and sobbed throughout it over May Mobley. If I think about some stuff too much ....lets just say sewing is good.
ERhh....no! But I'll do a helicopter land site on the rig instead.
Did you have a turning point in 2011? A point where homeschooling became easier, or conversely, more difficult?
The lead singer for the In-Men was Walter Scott, a good looking young man who continued to front bands like The Kommotions after leaving Bob Kuban in the late ’60s. Walter divorced his first wife, largely due to his affair with another woman; he wound up marrying “the other woman,” JoAnn Calcaterra, in December of 1969. Walter Scott and The Cheaters was the band name that he settled on in the early ’70s, and he proceeded to lead a musician’s life of endless weeks spent touring before periodically returning home to the St. Louis area. By 1980 his marriage to JoAnn was in trouble due to his constantly being away from home, coupled with her fears that he was having an affair with one of his backing singers. In December of 1983 Walter mysteriously disappeared, his car found abandoned at the St. Louis airport. It turns out JoAnn was involved with a local contractor named Jim Williams who had recently done some renovations to the Scott’s home. In October of that same year, Jim Williams’ wife Sharon died in a very strange car accident. She was found alone and unconscious in her vehicle. An autopsy wasn’t performed until 1987, when it was revealed that a savage blow to the back of her head had killed her, not the car wreck which was assumed to be the cause of her death. Shortly after Walter’s disappearance in late ’83, JoAnn and Jim Williams started living together; they finally got married in 1986. In 1987, the police questioned Jim Williams’s estranged son—who was then serving time in Florida on an unrelated matter—if he knew anything about Walter’s disappearance. He told them it was just a guess, but to check the cistern located behind his father’s home. Walter Scott’s body was later found inside the cistern and, eventually, Jim Williams was arrested. The twists and turns of these two murders are detailed in Scottie Priesmeyer’s book “The Cheaters—The Walter Scott Murder.”
“Don’t speak unless you are ______ __.”
I live in a place where everywhere I look is God's beauty before me.
On our anniversary trip in 2007, Betsy and I went to Virginia. After visiting Jamestown Settlement (a living history museum) we went to Historic Jamestowne, the site of the first English settlement in North America.
Down from £22!!....to £6.50.
I spent the first two days in a bit of a rage. How could Misha do this to me? How could he betray my trust as such a loyal Twitter follower? It was tough. No, I didn’t tear up my Misha posters or delete myself from all of the Misha Facebook groups to which I belong, nor did I cry into a box set of “Supernatural” DVDs.
I found these food baskets and table cloths at Dollar General as well, they were only $1.50. I also found the paper liners to go in the baskets on clearance at Walmart for $2.00 for 50 of them. These really cute paper straws came from an Etsy shop for a couple dollars for 50 of them, I'm hoping to find some cheap mason jars to use them with. This apple basket I scoured the internet to find some cheap ones, but came out unsuccessful, and then I went and found them half off at Hobby Lobby for just $1.50.
The going with the flow or sitting on the fence.
The motorcycle was customized for the XCOR rocket piston pump technology and then shipped to Motion Performance in Roswell. There XCOR engineers finished modifying and testing the bike for the trip. After making presentations at local schools with the bike as part of XCOR’s ongoing Science, Technology, Engineering and Mathematics (STEM) educational outreach efforts, the XCOR team was given a send-off by Roswell Mayor Del Jurney and members of the Roswell-Chaves County Economic Development Corporation. The trip symbolically started at the Robert Goddard Museum which honors the father of modern liquid rocketry and his early pioneering work in Roswell.
I have been looking through a dirty window for several weeks and I couldn't take it any longer. The ladder I was needing to clean the window was over at our shop and I didn't want to drive 5 miles to get it for a 2 minute job. Call me lazy I guess, but I just wanted the window cleaned RIGHT NOW!!!! So I did what any farm girl does and "farmer rigged" some concoction up to get my windows clean.
Preheat oven to 425 F. Line a baking sheet with foil and brush with 1 tbsp of olive oil.
This week I see myself starting to just barely tip over the large incline at the beginning of the emotional roller-coaster. I remember with Kiddo1 my emotions started at about the 30th week, mostly with crying at silly things like TV commercials. Long-distance commercials (sappy), diaper commercials, I don’t know, probably car commercials and Doritos ads, too. Who knows, but my reaction was mostly not justifiable.
We had a great evening with friends and other bloggers. We need to run cause we have another event this evening!
With a bare bodkin? who would fardels bear,
The 1995-1996 shutdowns were the longest amid the most heated battle over the budget between Congress and the President. President Clinton chose to veto several appropriation bills in the 1996 budget, at issue was funding amounts for social programs such as Medicare, Medicaid, public health, education, and the environment, all programs Clinton pledged to maintain to the public, however, the Republicans wanted Clinton to submit a seven year plan for a balanced budget. The Republican Congress could have voted on a continuance to keep the government operating on the previous fiscal years spending limits. However, the Republican controlled Congress looked to shut down the government hoping the public would blame the Democratic President, leading to a Republican victory in the next year’s Presidential election.
You have to go all the way to the end of the story to find its sponsor.
Right now I’m watching TV/Youtube and eating some
“My Date With Neanderthal Woman” by David Galef
But I’m writing this not to talk about the case. Or really racism. It’s more about America. The place that subconsciously supports the belittlement of people that are different. And in this case brown, non-white.
The 1st place winner of the jewelry contest competition. She had never made a single piece of jewelry and Margot and I really liked how she put all components together. The competition was about creating a look that would capture our design vision, and she did it!
Annabella When you are offline, what things in life inspire you to create your beautiful quilts?
33 p.
Do you demand the best from your professional career? Are you inspired by excellence? At SAP, you will have the power to make a real impact. As the global market leader for business software, SAP helps companies and organizations in more than 25 industries to run better.
As an aspiring filmmaker, this struck a chord with me. I had never thought of journalism as a cinematic experience but with the growth of multimedia journalism, it really is possible. Up until this moment, I had never thought I could do what I love through journalism; Mark Stencel had just changed my mind. I have now been playing with the idea of a career in digital media. The Savelkoul video was moving and that’s what I’ve always wanted to do. I want to reach people and make them feel something. I’m so happy to have had this realization as a junior because now I still have some time to explore an internship in digital media and can expand my prospects when looking for a job in he coming months!
I wanted to blurt out-"You're freaked out?"
This recipe is easily veganized, and vegan substitutions are indicated for the dairy ingredients. Often, bacon pieces are fried to render the fat used to sauté the vegetables. I chose to use a combination of extra virgin olive oil and butter for health reasons, and I don’t think the resulting chowder was any less tasty. If you like bacon, feel free to use it. If you would like your chowder somewhat thicker, you can add bread crumbs to the broth.
(I'd also like to thank Alan and Kat for their part in creating a place to tell the stories so that they, too, will not be forgotten. Congratulations on 100 Saturdays of Sepia!)
Aerosmith’s troubles started after the band was forced cancel its summer tour with ZZ Top following Tyler’s fall from the stage on August 5 in Sturgis, S.D.
Book details JFK affair with teen White House intern (Inquirer.net)
I tried to make this box in Shabby Chick style and it looks to be about right. :) I used a round paper mache box. The box top is decorated with some paper flowers, butterflies made with MS punch, sticker with lips and a laundry pin.
What can I control in the month of May? Plenty!
Something to drink
Etihad Airways has an additional four freighters scheduled for delivery in 2013 and 2014, two Boeing B777F and two Airbus A330-200F.
And like any other feeling
No, you don’t get to threaten to “stomp” a segment of your constituency just for being around, then claim you “never said anything about violence.” You did, on the record, to a reporter. And then you immediately reiterated that you would in fact attempt violence and don’t regret saying so.
What's up with our weather down here? When did Tucson pick up and move to New York state while I was sleeping? I swear on Saturday, it was snowing in the valley when I walked from work to the bus home. It didn't stick or accumulate. It sure felt like snowflakes hitting my face.
I wasn’t really expecting her to win, as the other dishes seemed more complicated. Though, the judges had worried Adrien’s dish might have too many elements while he was cooking, and Alejandra’s dish seemed like too many components to me. Maybe Jennifer’s simplicity was the key?
However he admitted that the Minister of FCT has powers to allocate and revoke allocations.
It is WELL worth your time!
In between opening boxes I guess I should cook dinner, too. Here's my plan...
JB-Use words instead of screaming
“I included a prayer booklet to St. Peregrine,” I said. “He’s a true wonder worker.” Then I proceeded to tell her what had happened a few Saturdays back.
My vacation days for the year are winding down as is my birthday. I've had some nice time off this summer but this past week has been just so-so. I picked up a head-cold on Monday and have been fighting it since. I can't recall the last time I was sick like this in August.
so we must see one of these on your creation.
keep a chain gang swinging, make a cat bird sing.
SEAN: The last book I read was Confessions by Tolstoy. I like to read philosophical books. I try in some way to incorporate the ideas in my books. I think it gives depth to the writing.
“Cory epitomizes dedication, academic performance, and decision-making based on analysis. He has a clear vision for his future in rural and food policy and will achieve it,” Dr. Coffey, Dodd’s Honors thesis advisor, said.
Article 1: All human beings are born free and equal in dignity and rights. They are endowed with reason and conscience and should act towards one another in a spirit of brotherhood.
Oh! If she’d only say, “Throw your paddles away”
Suave Dry Shampoo ($2.99 at Target): For years, dry shampoo was only available to those willing to spend $20+ on a bottle from the salon. Thanks to Suave, we now can all afford a bottle. I try not to wash my hair more than 3 times a week so this is a life saver for me. You just shake the bottle, spray it at your roots, tousle your hair, and you're good to go. I've also tried using this before bed so the oil has time to absorb. For about $3 a can, this is a must-have for every girl out there.
A lifelong commitment, that's being a parent, to care about smaller and bigger things, the being there, we have a duty, the morals that we teach them... that's what will (ideally) shape them, let's not underestimate the impact we have on our nearest and dearest.
Tah-dah!
Risk
You may never have heard of Jeff Adachi. After all, how many people can name the Public Defender, whether in a large city or small town? But Adachi has worked hard to rectify that, both in his own San Francisco—where he is the elected P.D., the only one in California—or here in Arizona, where he visited in the past week.
"Bad side of town," I said.
The official guests at the Fair were China but I am not posting a picture of their displays, not of a country where only "approved" writers could come as guests.
ROEPER REVIEW. We received a hot tip via listserv that several articles from this esteemed journal are available free of charge at the Taylor & Francis Online website. The articles include on on the neurobiological foundations of giftedness; personal goal setting for gifted underachievers; gender bias in gifted referrals; and others. Find the articles on the right side of this page.
First we pureed the heart, lungs, and blood with an electric hand blender and set the gory goo aside (the full recipe is at the end of the narrative). Next we slow cooked the hare, including the head, in red wine with some chopped vegetables in a deep, heavy aluminum pot in the oven for three hours, a process that left a nice, dense sauce and meat falling off the bone, and allowed plenty of time to deal with the rest of the menu while the hare was in the oven. The wine we used was a Rhone valley syrah, Eric's choice for reasons of aesthetics and taste: it would color the sauce a dark, deep brown and would also caramelize nicely.
As you begin to heal and experience living in higher vibrations things happen that you do not always understand at the moment they are happening to you. Your emotions can feel overwhelming at times and we wish tell you that you will adjust to this new you. Let the tears flow as they are a wonderful release from your emotional body. All tears are not because something bad has happened to you and you are sad, love and happy tears release such wonderful sensations within your physical vessel. Allow the angels to help you release any pent up emotions and open your heart to great love. Love is the strongest force in the Universe.
Don't forget about the awesome new stamps we have in the Fall Release from Woodware USA. Some of us have been busily using them in our creations, but you will see A LOT more in the coming weeks!
Sr.s.ly. Isn't her stuff amazing? Someone once asked me why I buy jewelry, since my shop is jewelry based.
Calories: Lets face it, even though it makes no difference to how fat and unhealthy most of us first worlders are, it sounds much better to say that the bottle of coke that you are about to drink contains 304 callories rather than 1,272 Joules.
I know I’m in for it when I hear this word at home. “You don’t ever…” and “You never” and “You always” – these are statements that I’ve gotten my beloved wife to see seldom accompany truth-telling. What they do accompany is strong feeling.
it is a real possession in the changing fortunes of time.
I always take there pictures on the first day and the last day of school to compare. Here are the first day pics.
Paint wooden ornaments
“By having clinical services that are specialized and interdisciplinary, you’re providing an avenue for parents to come and present for treatment,” Leibowitz said. “That brings a lot of people out of their closets, so to speak, and shows this is a less stigmatized issue, so that people can get the appropriate assessments and treatments that they deserve.”
A Hungry
Continue to work on your research papers. Remember that you need to have created four sources and ten notecards by midnight on Noodle Tools.
They often looked for food along the road since the forest is like "All you can eat Buffet" for them.
Every summer I think how can I possibly make it through another summer in Texas? It seems worse every year. I become a hermit, hiding out during daylight hours and constantly searching for things to make the heat more tolerable. I'm not one of those women who "glows" or "glistens" or any of that. I sweat. I sweat a lot. Dancing in milongas, especially barely-air-conditioned milongas, becomes almost more effort than it's worth.
And so the joke (thanks to Daniel Menaker in “A Good Talk”):
I find it very amusing that they can't find some girl who, well, looks more like Uma Thurman. But hey. I like people that aren't picky.
ATM cards don’t really open banks up to new business. It only drains money from them. It doesn’t matter if they are net-profit — a way a business stays profitable is by eliminating arms of the business that are not profitable.
Visiting her friend Jodie, Amy finds that she and Jack, the man she once thought she might marry, have spent the night together. Her younger sister Suzi has just arrived home with her 'Golden Delicious' Australian fiance in tow and announced their May wedding. And now Amy discovers that her best friend Beth is also planning on tying the knot, and Amy is asked to be bridesmaid. With a sinking heart, she remembers that old saying: always the bridesmaid, never the bride...
94. Wanderlove Kirsten Hubbard
I am not a knitter. I joined Ravelry to see where my girlfriend spends her time on the internet lol. In the 10 or so months that she’s been knitting I’ve been secretly/overtly observing and documenting this crazy thing called yarn and what it does to people. These things I know to be true.
Crying in the street
NAB booth #SL8124
Whitaker (the Housemartins) on drums and Jon Short on double bass.
The Great William Cash has laboured mightily to deliver unto the world a 130-page report on the "Treaty on Stability, Coordination and Governance", assessing its "impact on the eurozone and the rule of law".
A sloppy creature stares at me
Since we never did find whatever it was and John’s solution was to leave the flashlight beside the bed – in case I heard it again while he went back to watch the Beanpot, I decided to grab my book and head down the hall to sleep in Niki’s bed. Great, comfy bed which I’m still puzzling over why she has the best mattress in the house, but sleeping in a different bed in a different room knowing that there’s something with sharp claws wandering around out there, doesn’t make for a great night’s sleep. So, groggy and fuzzy brained, I’m not sure that I’ll paint today but I will update and post the WINNER OF THE RECIPE OF THE YEAR … see you next post!
but, I have a feeling that is going to change soon...
8) Wait for the dollar bill to be read, and make your purchase.
Dinner with my parents.
- Had I added coconut, I would have used unsweetened flakes rather than that sweetened shredded stuff, and toasted them before stirring into the muffin batter.
The malt bill was made up of 9 different malts, ranging from Pale Maris Otter to Roasted Barley & almost everything in between, the hops used were Chinook for backbone & Brambling Cross for flavour (no need to over-complicate big stout hopping) added to the boil was a good weight of Muscavado sugar, we had a mammoth four hour boil on this beer to make sure we hit all our numbers.
Johnston, H.H., The Negro in the New World, London, Methuen & Co., 1910.
A 73-year-old suspect, believed to be the father of the ex-soldier, was arrested. He is due in the Mqanduli Magistrate's Court shortly.
A couple of weekends ago, I met up with my besties Sue and Cecila for a girls day, which included an afternoon tea lunch, shopping, and lounging at the spa. I wanted to make something for us to snack on, and since I've been experimenting with tea-flavored ice creams lately, I thought tea-flavored macarons would be perfect!
Nutrition... calorie intake... exercise... there really is a lot to consider when trying to eat right and lose weight. Although I have lost 50 pounds, I have also been on a pretty significant plateau for the past several months. Three weeks ago, I went back to basics... making sure I was drinking a MINIMUM of 8 glasses of WATER a day... watching my caloric intake with the Weight Watchers Points program... and training a minimum of 5 times a week... and I only lost 2.8 pounds in the first 3 weeks. SHOOT! I was being very careful to eat my 1,200 calories a day and thought I should have lost more like 2 pounds a week.
In the “Schmalkald Articles,” Luther wrote that relics were tomfoolery and that “even the devil has laughed at such rascalities.” The veneration of relics, he said, ought to be condemned because such practices were not contained within Scripture. They were “an entirely unnecessary and useless thing.” Luther wrote in his “Large Catechism” that relics were “lifeless, dead things that can make no man holy.”
As always, I ask the question on everyone’s mind - Why so serious?
As usual I started to just post a picture and it turned into a project. This is a picture of two young girls taken between 1864 and 1866 in Springfield, MO by Charles W. Scholten. His studio was located at the South Side of Public Square in Springfield. The back of the photo has the three cent Civil War revenue stamp.
Last but not least, Kaitlyn turns 1 this Sunday. I am feeling quite guilty though because I don't have any thing planned, cake picked out or anything. I know she will never know, but it's 1st birthday and that's important. We have had so much happen in the last month, I just could not find the time to get things done. So I will be working on that tonight and tomorrow and see what I can come up with on Sunday.
Do you agree? Where is the line in your jurisdiction? Where do you think the line for copyright subsistence should lie? Please join in the debate using the comments section below.
A tale of sexual obsession without precedent in the history of cinema, The Housemaid, Kim Ki-young’s neglected masterpiece, fairly crackles with blistering intensity, provoking a sensation of horror mingled with delight. A half-century has not diminished the shock-value of the film, which rewarded the viewer with more genuine thrills than Japanese horror filmmaker Shinya Tsukamoto’s half-baked ghost story that also featured in the festival lineup. Stylish direction and caustic wit raise this noirish thriller to the top of the pack.
uninstalling this package.
No news on Jon Carew’s future as yet. He’s out of contract with Aston Villa in the summer and Pulis may offer him a contract, although he hasn’t played much for us since joining on loan in January due to injuries.
I wanted to update my readers on the bad experience I had with Cheryl and Co. the other week. Once I posted the bad experience, Cheryl and Co. contacted me to send me a replacement shipment. So, I must say that I’m impressed with their customer service! They contacted me within a few hours of the post going up and apologized for my experience.
I have had a ton of questions about how I hang my pictures. So here is the info.
Now this, my friends, is something worth researching!
On a brighter side, maybe this is karma's (not my cat - the other karma) way of reminding me to take part in Earth Hour Chicago. This is something that my company is backing pro bono and I encourage all of you Chicagoans to get involved. Turn off your power for one hour tomorrow at 8. Go to the website. Learn more. Make a statement. Link on your blog. Do it. More importantly, do it because you want to...not because you might flip a breaker because your bathroom light fixture is leaking water and you are scared to turn anything on.
The following is a report of what happened at the execution:
This icon of American industry is a company full of good employees who make some good products (and is the parent company of a huge media outlet), but GE is also a large American corporation that pays virtually no corporate income taxes despite earning worldwide profits of $14.2 billion last year, $5.1 billion of it in the United States. In fact, they claimed a tax benefit of $3.2 billion, meaning they received more of our hard earned tax dollars than they contributed. How is that possible? It’s because not only do they shelter their money from taxes, but they also get many tax credits, loans, government grants, and other benefits from the federal government that our smaller businesses couldn’t even imagine being able to profit from.
20 here
Away from the particular to the philosophical:
In fact, it is more important that you hold to the straight and the horizontal than that you use the full face of the bat.
Whitehorse said she stayed in the Bay area for four years, then went home.
The barrister then gives us the shocking reality of this case, and of the scale of the wider problem, the attitude of these imports from a barbaric culture and religion from the dark ages. When reading this I would like you to consider the mental attitude and moral codes of the hundreds of thousands of bogus “asylum seekers”, immigrants and migrants from the third world:
My husband prefers chocolate. Dark chocolate cake with dark chocolate icing. Usually I am all for this. But after eating 3 peices of my husbands birthday cake one night, i discovered how much caffeine really is in chocolate. My breastfed baby was wide awake and ready to play in the the middle of the night. Mass amounts of dark chocolate before bed is out….carrot cake is in!
To better express this, I’ve subtitled our session Worship as Fuel for the Fight. Every soldier has his rations to sustain him in war, and if he doesn’t get them or doesn’t eat them he grows weak and he dies. As Christian soldiers, we’re in the habit of calling our rations “means of grace”. These are the means God has given us by which we improve and maintain our strength — things like baptism, the Lord’s Supper, prayer, fasting, searching the Scriptures, Christian fellowship, and so on. To which I want to add, singing.
Stop looking for hard, concrete proof. Go with the flow. And stop trying to nail it down and say, “Well, this feels like magic, so now I’m in the fourth.” “This feels like love and Christ consciousness; now I am in the seventh.” “Now, this feels like the ability to create: I am in the eighth.” “Now, I am sitting with my beloved Jesus Sananda: I am in the eleventh.”
Want to taste the new Atlantis on draft? Find it this Wednesday at Mama's Crowbar in Portland. They will be tapping the first ever kegs! So, come on out, support this local brewing company, chat with Nathan, the brewer, & enjoy fresh, delicious brew!
I know you
once you are in Universal Studio's Islands of Adventures
Once I am done going through all of the cards, though, I have some plans to get some other things done. It is just going to take patience. Again. And some extreme scheduling on my part to get these things done.
I said "Thirty pounds"
Spellbinders Classic Diamonds
Using a cookie scoop or similar sized utensil, scoop 1-inch (2.5 cm) balls of cookie dough onto the baking sheet, leaving about an inch (2.5 cm) between. You now have two options:
support I'd like to give each of you who played along with BLD22 a thank you image,
– Brando interviewed Port at the Atlantic Regional in Miami. Also at that regional, a young Miami Herald sportswriter named Dan Le Batard documented an exchange with Port that went in part like this:
Lit by the last of the sun—
Mr Sheridan began by his questioning by asking Mr Wight if it would be fair to describe him as gatekeeper for “the dark side”. Mr Wight disagreed, and asked whether Mr Sheridan mean the question literally, and was enquiring into his status as a Jedi Knight.
However, the Bible does say:
Mint is hot hot hot at the moment …..well except that as colors go its decidely cool in tone. How to use such a color in your home? Sparingly seems to be the answer, as an accent or a hint.
*EXTRA ENTRIES*
According to media reports, this PRC beggar claimed that she needs money urgently to pay medical bills for her dying daughter who had Leukemia.
Being the rather interesting beer it is, I thought that saving it for a special occasion seemed like the most appropriate thing to do, with suggestions of saving it for my 21st birthday that's coming up in August or to open it on the 110th anniversary of its brew day next February floating around, I then decide that I was too impatient to wait that long and that the pubs anniversary was just as good of a reason to crack it open as any. I waited until the band took a well earned 20 minute break, and then rounded up the selected few who I decided I would share this special brew with, and then made our way to the pubs function room to drink and talk about this historic bevvie.
Indeed, there was GCC/Cullercoats, right on cue, and nice and strong, perfect decode quality. A little later came EJM/Malin Head. Not as strong, and a few errors, but it was daytime, so that's only to be expected.
My friend and I accidently ran into these tickets, but there was no hesitation AT ALL. We’ve bought them straight away and I’ve been so excited ever since! For the ones who don’t know him; I’ll post some of his wonderful songs below. For the ones who do know him; I’ll post some of his wonderful songs below. (; Just because they’re extremely pleasant to listen to! (:
Maryam said that Rajab had refused to respond to any of the charges put against him as he did not recognize the legitimacy of the court.
The office of the prosecutor – Luis Moreno-Ocampo – was found to have not identified a key witness.
Add to this the surprisingly flexible limits of "realistic" presentation under any circumstances, not just haunted houses, and things really become loose. Few films or rides concern themselves too much with reconciling inside and outside architecture. Someone with a perfect sense of architectural space may wince once in awhile, "knowing" that if the character really did turn left down that hallway, he should by rights walk smack into the outer wall of the house, but for the most part such concerns are ignored. This includes size considerations. With the HM, even if we discard about a third of the show building as housing an outdoor scene (the graveyard), the square footage of the house we experience is still much larger than anything that could pass for the "original" house remodeled into the current Mansion.
Right choices = Right results
Themes + Style: Centered heavily with frequent references to Charles Lutwidge Dodgson’s Alice in Wonderland. Pandora Hearts adopts the same synesthetic and nonsensical stylisation. Some events and characters that feature in Pandora Hearts are clearly influenced by Alice in Wonderland. I personally really like these recognizable echoes in the manga because while it gives the reader some enjoyable references, it also leaves room for innovation. I thought the whole design of Pandora Hearts universe and how the mangaka alternates between Alice in Wonderland and Pandora Hearts is very creative.
This is a real tub that's been squashed and you hang it on your wall. I know, it's art. I actually studied art, here and in Europe, but I just don't get this one. You can check out the listing HERE and HERE.
(2) Six (or more, c'mon, we're among friends) of the following symptoms have persisted for the duration of your time on Blogger, to a degree that is maladaptive and inconsistent with the level present in your other hobby activities, including, but not limited to scrapbooking, fantasy football, online poker, gardening, and masturbation.
As you can see our schedule is very laid back and I let her choose many parts of the day. I do have set goals each day, like I usually want to at least finish math, spelling and memory work each day. Additionally I would like to get some other curriculum thrown in, but I don't have a set one for each day it's as I think we need it and she can handle it. Since we just came back to school this week it's a slow start getting back up to being able to do as much as I would like in a day, but we are building that skill up again and will soon be chugging along. Part of my problem is I don't get up early, and somedays we don't really start til 11 with the real school work. My next goal is going to be getting up earlier so we can start our morning Routine at 8:30 or 9:00 at the latest. That should help with the not having enough day for all our work!
Armed with that info, you need a perfect clear day. Deep blue skies with no clouds–the classic High Pressure system.
13. Mother’s Day
My self-esteem took two blows today…
BLITZER: All right.
An example of this was last week's horrific attack in Meyersdal, south of Johannesburg, in which a couple's daughter was gang-raped and both parents were shot and wounded by the police, who mistook them for the robbers.
13:24.9 Michael Musyoki 1978
People through all ages may play RC cars. It is fun and is attractive the little one inside an individual. Idea keeps growing in a fast pace. The sole distinction between real cars and REMOTE CONTROL cars will be the size. The best regarding REMOTE CONTROL car offers abilities of high speed and can be transferred forwards, in reverse or perhaps circular very easily. The newest advancements associated with RC cars consist of types which can execute tricks like actual cars.
Everything yet can be exhausted.”
3.) Heat the oil in a large pot over med heat. Peel the onion and finely chop. Add to pot. Cut the chicken into bite size pieces. Add to pot and raise heat to med-high. Cook, stirring, until chicken is almost cooked through (~4 minutes).
Good Morning folks, sorry I've been a rubbish blogger this week, had a very busy week and also been trying to pack and stuff before we go away. We're off to Blackpool for a few days, hope the sunshine stays around.
Away but the weather turned around.
So Mike/Irving changes into a wolfman every so often, chases and catches women and brings them back to the cave as Aluc makes women appear to him from inside their homes, hotel rooms, what have you. And believe it or not, a lot of female nudity, simulated Sixties sex and lame-brained coincidences ensue right up to the end, which is about as doltish as you'd expect.
Ally
Unfortunately, according to her, she has no talent or is yet to find out her talent. Well, I believe she has and she sure has not discovered it yet. But where is it?
The site, now known as Ouseburn Farm, was re-opened in 2005 and now houses a new environmental and heritage centre which lets youngsters learn about environmental issues relevant to their lives and also teaches them about life in the Ouseburn Valley in days gone by.
I was successful in my baking and cooking endeavors last Friday (for the most part – slacked, as usual with the last of the clean up). Thankful for the prep work I did the day before because good gawd cooking from scratch and eating less processed food can and does mean a lot more work for someone (me). You really need to be dedicated and buy into the philosophy of whole foods, clean eating, etc. If you don’t you won’t be able to sustain the practice.
1 cup (225 g) unsalted butter, softened to room temperature
The dreams are there in their
Fill box with cutlery, bowls and cups (not forgetting t'towels, oven gloves, and knife, oh and tin opener... oh and dish sponge)
“Getting my I-Pad. I want to see when the next dark moon is.” She grabbed the electronic notebook and sat back down in the recliner with a whoop.
It’s the most wonderful time of the year! Here at Hooray for Books, our holiday section has exploded into a vibrant display of red and green and silver and gold. It’s a great spot to stop awhile and browse! But if you’re in a rush, one of our friendly booksellers is more than happy to show you their “go-to” books for the season. And I, dear readers, am no different. There are certain books that I just love to hand sell during the holidays. Here are a few of my top picks!
We've received two comments on our earlier post about the proposed new building on Columbia Street (see below). A clarification of the criticism of the original post is in order: nowhere is it indicated that the new building should be designed using a traditional or historic vocabulary. The Waterfront District is indeed a 'mixed bag' of styles (as are most New York neighborhoods, actually) and of course contemporary design can coexist successfully with historic buildings.
We had it at one of the boy's houses and he had a trampoline, so really...the kids were content to play back there while the parents visited inside. Not even sure they really cared about the ice cream! This was the best shot I got of Hyrum with his coaches.
An hour later Brycen started whimpering in his sleep. He's been doing this a lot lately and we always let him just go back to sleep. Eventually he started full out crying and getting really upset. We decided to bring him out in the living room with us for a few minutes to let him calm down. Tyson went in to get him and brought him out in the living room. Brycen smiled and laughed when he saw me. He looked so cute in his pajama shirt with those pudgy legs hanging out.
I have in my heart how when I asked you if I was a good daughter, you struggled to say, "yes, you were a good girl."
And I really loved all the creative tags everyone shared!
Ever since he has been sick he has been sleeping in the car seat. When we were in the hospital, every time I laid him down he woke back up coughing. So I have been very leery about laying him on his back. Looking at it that way, I received the Miracle Blanket at just the right time. As baby Harold has finally gotten rid of his cough and we are done with his breathing treatments I felt safe laying him on his back during the night.
In my quest for the magical threesome, I created an online dating profile and went on a few dates, but I couldn’t find anyone suitable. I met a couple of swingers. I met a transsexual lady. I met a girl who talked too much, but no one I would have liked to take home.
Pendulum Divination: This was the first type of divination I’ve learned and has used the longest. As a rule, I never delve in too far too the future since I find that the farther I look ahead, the less accurate the information becomes. If I have to, I will look days ahead, but that’s it.
He was silent for a few moments. There was something that he was going to say; also I had the feeling that his inner intensity was too powerful for the medium of words. I had no idea what was coming, but I knew something was about to happen. Silently he was holding my eyes with his dark burning look. Then with an extremely tense voice, he exploded, “You know, I think that those people who go about helping other people .. .” He stopped— then, with an even more piercing gaze, he spat out the next words like bullets of contempt: “those people … they are a curse!”
Here’s the exterior (my camera didn’t capture their neon sign):
The first batch are in the safe hands of Her Majesty's Postal Service as we speak. If you don't get one in the next couple of days, and you'd like one, just drop us an email to doubles@sellsell.co.uk
I present to you, the cow!
The plain truth so vividly explained in the Gītā, which is the central lesson of the Vedas, is not understood or even suspected by the most powerful scholars of the empiric schools. Herein lies the secret of Śrī Vyāsa-pūjā. When we meditate on the transcendental pastimes of the Absolute Godhead, we are proud to feel that we are His eternal servitors, and we become jubilant and dance with joy. All glory to my divine master, for it is he who has out of his unceasing flow of mercy stirred up within us such a movement of eternal existence. Let us bow down at his lotus feet.
And I don’t know how to be a love like that.
I have to choose ten words beginning with L that are important to me. Val had the letter R, Firebyrd from whom she took over the game had the letter B. If you want to play, let me know in the comments and I will assign you a letter. Okay, last leg of blog post. Wheeze, gasp, puff, pant... And in no particular order...
If you will believe the truth about Christ, and what He has accomplished in His death, burial, and resurrection, you may receive not only the forgiveness of sins, but
So the apostle would later write in Colossians 3:1-3,
When it comes to the wine, a waiter might be able to settle your needs by successfully suggesting a glass of 2005 Fallegro Favorita, a slightly effervescent white to help cut through the richness of salumi-heavy appetizers and a Monferrato Pinot Nero or Barbaresco to match with the meaty pasta dishes, but not all staff are up to helping with pairings. Some of them know their knowledge limits better than others. Whilst one waitress sensibly rushed to fetch the sommelier when our questions were too difficult for her, another insisted on making quite the show of her ignorance after we'd ordered a glass of something she'd recommended. She opened a new bottle in front of us, made quite a little theatre of sniffing it and approving it before passing it to the ever eloquent Fred who on sipping immediately declared "Crap!". I took a sniff and agreed that it was unmistakeably corked which left the waitress understandably red faced after her hollow perfomance. The lesson here - if you begin to suspect that your waitstaff's wine knowledge is lacking, insist on speaking with the wine director. You will most certainly get better wine service if you do. The approachable sommelier thoughtfully listened to my attempts to try and describe the kind of reds I like, before translating my needs into Italian and producing a ripe, soft, barnyardy bottle of Pigi Poggio di Bortolone. He read my instructions perfectly.
Let me say it again:” My Cheese Burger is the best dish!”
Character is the foundation on which you build your life. It all begins with character, because leadership operates on the basis of trust. Your trust in God reveals your character towards God.
Chestnuts & Brown Sugar - light notes of roasted chestnuts wrapped in an abundance of creamy brown sugar.
Fold the meat mixture, vegetables and the remaining cheese blend into the sauce just enough to blend. Spoon this on top of the noodle mixture.
I had a wonderful Thanksgiving weekend, spending lots of time with my family. We visit a lots places in Puerto Rico such as El Yunque, Old San Juan and shopping to in the black Friday weekend.
On the opposite coast, the 2012 National Canadian Celiac Association Conference is taking place from May 25 – 27 in Kelowna, B.C. Looks like there will be lots of interesting speakers and topics, so if you’re in the area, it might be worth a visit!
In a brief return to political matters... What won’t the candidates be discussing during this election season? Campaign finance, surveillance, patent reform…are among a few issues that candidates are sure to avoid. What else....? This mini-slide show shows just a few. In fact, the matters discussed at sciencedebate.org are (in my opinion) more important -- and here you can vote for the top science issues facing America in 2012.
So, if you are looking for a good diet picture book for your 4 year old, call a nutritionist, then your pediatrician, then your therapist. Then give your 4 year old a hug, and don't buy this book.
These were all taken between March-April, in San Francisco and a couple of them in Marin county.
This one called for taking everything out of both fridge and freezer; tossing what was gross; quickly scrubbing the inside of the fridge/freezer while everything was out of it; putting the good stuff back in but in a more organized manner. (There is some Food Waste Friday material from this challenge that you will see later). I actually didn’t do this task. I woke up Sunday morning to TGF doing it for me. He even took pics!
billion, making it the 6th
and he was such a lovely person. He left quite a big
95:5 The sixteen attributes are the eleven senses and the five elements in their subtle forms called Mahabhutas. Added to this is Infinity. The Supreme Being, according to the Sankhya doctrine, is thus the embodiment of the number seventeen. Thy form as conceived by the Sankhyas, i.e., thy form as Number.
But after I buy what I'm saving up for, I think this will be next.:)
Much love, Branden
Sikov MR, Montgomery LD, Smith LG, Phillips RD. Studies on prenatal and postnatal development in rats exposed to 60-Hz electric fields. Bioelectromagnetics 1984; 5: 101-112.
Divergent was a HUGE DEAL. Huge. Insurgent promises to be, “another intoxicating thrill ride of a story, rich with hallmark twists, heartbreaks, romance, and powerful insights about human nature.” Are you reading it? What do you think?
For more Born Again Brazilian, go to www.bornagainbrazilian.com.
I found this recipe on Skinny Jeans Food and was pleasantly surprised at how amazing these little snacks were. I was a bit skeptical about the raw oat thing but they turned out to be one of our new favorite snacks. Sweet, simple and the orange zest really made the flavors POP.
Put a little gravel in my travel
is alive and reigns, conquers and commands,
Another reason for mentioning Fiji is that it provides us with a very good example of of how fragile an indigenous culture is, and how vulnerable an indigenous people can be when faced with an aggressive, or ambitious, immigrant race.
I forgive myself that I have accepted and allowed myself intoxicate myself on the experience/energy of relationship and sex.
This is just a quick post, a few sneak peaks of what I've been working on.
Police then continued to pursue the rally-goers down several streets amid chaotic scenes which saw violence from both sides over the next four hours.
